The tiny burrito bowl cost about $12. And all side ingredients except rice, beans cheese and salsa cost extra. A sprinkle of lettuce for 75 cents. Plus the staff is unfriendly at times. I an going to stop giving them a chance. No more for me!!! 1 3 
What happened? We used to love this place. The same items we used to get now taste horrible. And the price seems to be way more. Should have kept the old owner on as a consultant. Will have to drive to coral or Osaka now. 1 2 
I've stumbled upon this restaurant on my vacation to Montreal. We were greeted by the host and seated to our table promptly. The restaurant was beautifully decorated inside and out. Now that is all positives I can give to this restaurant. We waited for over 30 minutes only to be served water. My husband told the waiter that we were ready to order. He nodded his head and disappeared for another 15 minutes. We weren't going to wait longer so we walked out. The waiter could have offered us a drink or something while we wait or even say that they are backed up and apologize for the wait... 1 2 
TAKE NOTE! I have sat with my daughters to get their nails done and it's always been $25 per set plus $5 extra for a gel top coat. The one time I couldn't accompany them, they were charged $70 for the same service. I never thought after years of being a client, they would charge my daughters extra for the same service! Not just that but for some reason, 2 people worked on them. One for acrylic and another to paint. That was also a first. Were you charging them extra for having 2 manicurists? Shotty work this time around! Shameful. Just shameful! CUSTOMER BEWARE! After leaving a negative review, CT Nails have called TWICE to harass me! 1 3 
Wow, that had to be one of the worst brunches I have ever had. My wife and I arrived shortly after they opened today and were seated at a 2 person table that was wobbly, you know the kind where you have to put a sugar packet underneath it? We proceeded to the food and at first was a little taken aback by how ordinary it was. No prime rib carving station, but instead a pre-carved pork loin slices. The "gourmet" meat station was just pepperoni (no other deli meats), single cheese cubes, and crackers. No omelet or egg stations... The grits were runny and cold. The scrambled eggs were either powered or carton eggs that were also cold. The assorted baked goods, were mainly little muffins that I swore were Lil Bites. The sausage links were shriveled. OMG, I'm not kidding, everything was cold.  I would question whether they are testing the food temperatures. Do yourself a favor and avoid this brunch, at $19 a person I expected a lot better and felt like I  was fleeced. I'll stick to the brunches at the Fish Market in Baxter Village or Waldhorn's Sunday brunch. 1 2 
I am an Elite Plus Member.  I've spent a lot of money here (around $6K in the last 12 months), for a couple of reasons:1. Its convenient, and I like looking/touching/experiencing things before I buy.2. Its not right to use a brick and mortar store to test gear out, and then buy online.3. They would price match the items I found from licensed sellers online.4. Their rewards program incented me to continue to consider them as a viable option for a vendor to purchase all my technology.After today's call, I will no longer be spend money at Best Buy.Scenario:On July 11th, I used a $35 Reward Certificate (the money you get back from purchases you make) to buy a $38 cable.On July 27th, I returned that cable.  I noticed that my return receipt did not reflect the use of my Gift Certificate.  It appeared as though I was only receiving the amount over the $35 Reward Certificate back.I brought this to the attention of the Customer Service Person at the Returns Counter, and he told me that I would see that in my online account in 5 business days.The next day, I call in to the Rewards Support Line to be sure he was telling me the correct thing.  He was not.They tell me they fixed it, and I should see the certificate by August 4th. (that was a twenty minute call or so).I don't see it by August 4th and call back on August 7th.  The phone rep, Tracy, then tells me she has fixed it, and I'll see it by the 13th.  (that was another twenty minute call or so).I don't see it by August 13th, so I call back in today, and the phone rep Ada then tells me she has fixed it, and I should see it within 5 days.I've had enough, and I ask to speak to her supervisor.  Her supervisor, Lisa, reiterates that they can't  issue me the credit instantly (I tell her I get that), but ALSO notices that not all the proper steps were taken in order for me to get the credit back (so I would have waited another 5 days to find that I still didn't get the money back, if I had not asked to speak to her).  She then does some magic, and tells me I'll see the credit back today (even though she told me that was impossible).  That was a 56 minute call.This is where it all went wrong:1. The original sales rep who sold me the cable didn't apply the Rewards Certificate correctly.  2. The rep who accepted the merch return misled me, and told me the credit was going to automatically return to my online account. 3.  The first phone rep told me she fixed it - she did not.4.  The second phone rep, Tracy, told me she fixed it - she did not.5.  The third phone rep, Ada, told me she fixed it - she did not.6. When I told Lisa that I had already lost the value of the certificate by simply having to be on the phone with them for almost 2 HOURS TOTAL, with no credit issued back to me, was enough for me to stop using Best Buy - she said sorry, we hate to lose you - and that's about it.I still have not seen the credit (was she just trying to get a frustrated customer off the phone?).This, combined with the fact that the in store reps seem to always create new Rewards accounts for you, rather than adding purchases to a single account (thereby negating any benefit from the multiple purchases you make there), makes me think that my money is better spent somewhere else.If I'm an Elite Plus member, and they see I spend a relatively large sum of money there, and they treat me like this, how would they treat you, the casual customer?Amazon Same Day Shipping is available in our area when you're a Prime Member. 1 5 
Go to Joe's Diner if you want good food because they've got it. Especially breakfast, which is excellent. Everything I've tried at this place (and their original 16th St. location) has been great. It's not cuisine, it's diner food and it's done right.On the other hand, if you also value good service with your delicious chow, forget this place. On previous visits, the service has often been spotty, but it's easy to cut them some slack because the food's good and, after all, it's a diner. This morning I spent an hour and ten minutes sitting at Joe's counter, with only about 20 minutes devoted to actual eating. And I never got a second cup of coffee.After the folks sitting next to me -- who came in after I did -- received their food, I flagged down another employee to inquire. Apparently, the server failed to give my order to the kitchen. Eventually, my breakfast bowl arrived, hot, delicious and, maybe even worth the wait. The server mumbled an apology for its lateness but had to be asked to provide me with utensils. About that coffee: The personable young woman who took my order was careful to explain that they were out of their special cups for decaf drinkers, so I should watch out in case someone tried to give me a refill with regular. Indeed, the VERY SAME SERVER came back to me later with regular coffee and tried to put it in my cup. As instructed, I stopped her and said I was drinking decaf. My cup remained empty and that was the last I saw of my server. And this was the last time I'll visit Joe's. Great eats just aren't worth the aggravation of being ignored. 1 4 
Interesting experience.  I was not offered a particular type of massage.  Swedish or deep tissue as advertised.  I believe I ended up getting a Swedish massage.  A significant amount of time  focused on my groin area.  ( No happy ending was offered)  I was unable to communicate with my masseuse and his English was very very poor.  When I left and paid what I thought was the HST I was denied a receipt.  When I asked I was told that my masseuses was not a licensed  registered  massage therapist and I would not be able to claim this expense through the extended health care plan. I feel that the Group misrepresented the massage I had bought.   I would not return to this place. 1 2 
Me and my two friends decided to try out this place because there were lots of good reviews about it. When we enter the resto at about 5pm, there were nobody in there except for a table of highschool girls almost done with their food. We decided to help ourselves and chose a table for the three of us. The server (some middle aged chinese guy) gave us the menu without saying anything. SERIOUSLY? Menu book looks good but the food is a little bit pricey like a deep fried chicken wings (5 wings only) for $6. So we ordered then it took them 30 mins to serve our food knowing that there's nobody in there except us. why sooo slow? I could've understand if there's other customers like us but really?? So both of my 2 friends got their order, finish eating them yet there I was waiting for my bbq ribs for an hour. I decided to ask the server for the follow up and he said he'll check it. Okay.After 15 mins, my friend told the other lady server about my food and she said it's coming.After 30 mins, still there was no sign of bbq ribs.After 45 mins, me and my friends decided to cancel the order and pay the bill.It took us 2 hours and a half staying in that place. Two hours waiting for the food, in total.I know the bbt is good but the wings and skewers? mehh. we've had the worst experience there. we even thought that they don't really care wasting their energy serving us with moderate customer service because they thought we were just some cheap college students. UGGHH, i was so furious. 1 2 
we have been here 3 times and it has progressively gone downhill. the service sucks. if you want to be ignored in an empty bar, this is your place! the bartender was downright surly and rude and was as ungracious as he could be when he served a beer. the first time we came here we really enjoyed the whole experience. the second time things were getting a tad shaky. this last time IS the last time. we had to get up twice to ask (it is 5:10 pm, by the way, on a Thursday with 4 servers standing around) for beer and food. the food was barely acceptable and the burger I took home and ate later on actually made me seriously sick. the tuna salad is listed as 6 ounces, but in reality was only 2 ounces. the bathroom was like a walk-in freezer, and is dingy, like the rest of the place. low lights everywhere except in the "kitchen", if you drop something, kiss it goodbye, unless you have a flashlight. employees have a "chain-gang" ambience which really makes it a tempting place to be in the historical cleveland heights cavalcade of restaurants. we left 15 per cent because we respect working people but this is one bunch that really did not deserve a penny. our advice glance once and keep on driving! 1 2 
Not sure why I continue to stop at this KFC. First visit food was great. Second visit we got home and bit into the biscuits and they were all raw dough. 3rd visit the forgot a couple items. 4th visit tonight I sat in the drive thru 4ever and then decided to go in. I witnessed the female manager arguing with a male employee who was using f-bombs!! Very unprofessional. The male employee clocked out and left!! I stood for awhile and I think they forgot my order. I was the only one standing and waiting. Place was empty. The service is slow, employees are unprofessional... I'm taking my business back to Canes. It's worth the drive!!! 1 2 
I've read some very negative reviews of this location regarding how young the management staffs are. I personally have no problem with age except when they have no clue how to take care of problem. Apparently they only care about themselves, not customers. My wife & I have never been disrespected & insulted as much as we were yesterday by an employee of this Target. Yes, at this location. I'll call the employee 'Miss B', a young Afro-American female at early 20's or maybe late teens. I'm just trying to give as much description as possible cuz she took her name tag off to hide her identity as this is happening. The supervisor (young male) comes over & hides Miss B in a room by Customer Service after Miss B asked him to get me out of the store? Really? She's asking her supervisor to move customers out of the store? All the supervisor did was trying to lie to me when the store manager showed up. Now the supervisor runs away cuz I caught him lying thru his teeth. As I'm talking to the manager named Kyle, another customer who heard what/how Miss B talked to us passed by and said "she (Miss B) was pretty nasty to these people". Of course Kyle doesn't give shit about this witness. Now This so called store manager (Kyle) refuses to give me her name when I told them I wanted to file official complaint. Everyone is wearing nametags!! After I talked to Kyle, I still hear Miss B talking shit with another woman about me ? Wow, Kyle, who claimed to be the store manager simply gave me a number to call to file a complaint. This store is a Perfect example of how incompetent manager produces incompetent employee. One after the other just lying thru their teeth to cover their own shits. How do I give negative stars? Damm !!! No one deserves to be treated this way when they come here to spend their money. Now, let's see what HQ has to say when I contact them. 1 2 
The service at this establishment does not warrant me wasting any more time typing than this. 1 2 
I like this tanning salon but THIS LOCATION is awful.  The "manager" older lady that is always orange/tan is way too pushy.  I have been there of a total of 3 different times trying to have her recover and each time she pushes and pushes for me a buy something else like a $50 lotion or higher level tanning package.  She acts like she is helping me out when i'm telling her that's not what I want at all.  I literally said you are not understanding me and she kept trying to push on the up sale.  NOT OK. so I walked out for the third time. 1 2 
My two friends and I got free passes to The Bank and were super stoked.  Then we each got 3 free drink tickets which we were also stoked about.The environment seemed nice, dark and fun.However, after being there for awhile, we noticed the ambiance wasn't quite right. It had a really strange mix of people in the club and the music was just not upbeat enough. I was not feeling it.My heels were hurting my feet from dancing and walking all over Vegas, I took them off. Then, I got yelled at from some security guy working there to put my shoes back on. That was nice...After we each got a free drink (limited to simple drinks), we went up for round two. However, the free drink tickets ended at midnight. Soo... after already ordering a drink I said, oh well, I'll pay for it anyway. I ordered a red bull and vodka, ran my card through and went to sign the bill which was $19!!!! FOR ONE DRINK?!?! I mean I know Las Vegas is over priced but REALLY? I then refused to pay for the drink, especially since I originally thought it was going to be free. The barmaid told me i would have to leave or else they were going to call security.........I said, "Well we were planning on leaving anyway!"So we left.I would not recommend this place to anyone. Yeah its free to get in and you get free drinks till midnight, but who isn't drinking after midnight? It sounds like a ploy to get you drunk and then get you to spend way too much on drinks at a crappy club. 1 2 
I used to love this place but then I had some 2 bad experiences.  The first time I got a take out and when I got home I (about 15 min later) I opened the food box and my bread was wet.  When I say wet I mean wet like soaked- ughhh.Since I had great experience in the past, I went again and this time I got  food poisoning and spend the whole day in the bathroom-double ughh. I must say one great thing about them is their juices and coffees I would stay away from their food though. 1 2 
I agree with Stacy L. Terrible service. Went for lunch before the basketball game because it's close to Kohl Center.  Some customers got wait staff, some had to wait at the bar to order. No logical way they take or fill orders. Food was just so-so. Should have done what our 2 vegetarians did - walked over to Potbelly & brought food back here to watch the game while they ate. At least I saved money by not tipping & we got to the game early because we couldn't stand the place. Hey guys, you can't run a bar without staff!! 1 2 
Went in for the first time today for the awesome price on the smog check.  The workers were pleasant but condescending.  After about a 10 minute wait, the technician informed me that it failed due to the gas cap seal starting to crack with age, but everything else was fine.  He then handed me the invoice with all of the other "recommended services" to the tune of $1105.00. The guy at the counter then told me that once I bought a new gas cap and came back he would charge me the $10 again and redo the whole thing.  After buying a new gas cap, I took my business to another inspection center.  The gentleman there was incredulous they would charge me twice when it was only the gas cap.  In short, go elsewhere to people who care about their customers and not just the money. 1 2 
Sheila kept my money when i ended up not needing the divorce i paud her to do. Two months still has my $600 1 2 
We dodged a bullet with this person.  Wanted to have my bathroom remodeled.  I did my homework, checked the bbb, reg of contractors, etc, all A+ back in november.  He promised the work to be done in ~3 weeks ( in time for christmas).  I finally got most of the work done (gave up on a few of the items we did want done but weren't critical) by Feb 28th.  This one is a good example of why the current system doesn't work too well.  No matter how careful you are there are people out there that can take advantage of you or rip you off.  I managed to get out with the work that was done being ok (because I kept pushing and threatening).  Not my idea of how to get work done. 1 5 
I will start with the good! Sushi was good!SERVICE SUCKS! We sat for 15 mins before going up to the bar and had to ask for a drink. It was not even crowded. Service was so bad when we wanted anything we would have to go to the bar to get drinks which were weak. The bartender was so rude she acted as if we were putting her out. After being here for over 2 hrs and this going on we asked for a Manager who never came over. We asked again for the manager who walked past us 3 different times before coming over and was so taken back by our comments about her staff. She was RUDE and basically said it looks like the food was good since you eat it. REALLY THATS NOT CUSTOMER SERVICE!!!I think the staff all young girls in their low 20's were more interested in the guys at the bar then servicing the customers they have.  We still tipped the staff but really should not have since the service was so bad.I would NOT suggest going here unless you want MAD SERVICE! 1 2 
Very disappointed that we didn't get all of our order. I ordered 1 lg 1 lg for .30 and our free pizza. the 2 pizza's came but the last one never did. Delivery guy said he was going back to store and would be back with our free pizza NEVER Happened, Very unhappy customer. might have to change pizza companies or change to carry out and change stores... 1 2 
Entered the "sports bar" at noon today to catch some NCAA basketball tournament games. They were playing country music. I am not sure what they were thinking and I didn't wait around to find out. TV's don't make a sports bar, maybe they should take the word "Sport" out of their name? 1 3 
Seriously just because this is in west springs/ cougar ridge doesn't mean it needs to be over priced.  Felt so ripped off the pastries are tiny and just mediocre.  I get that this is a small business but find it hard to understand how much it would cost to to actually make the sizes to a size that has substance to it. 1 2 
Came to this location of On Tap after a long day at work.  I was seated immediately, and we got our drinks asap. The food wasn't anything to write home about and our waitress (Miss Brookelynn Estepp) was terrible.  We saw her 2 times the entire time we were there.  We were ending our meal and got our checks.  I paid my $50 tab while my fiancee tipped in cash (how we always prefer to pay at restaurants) I even tipped an extra $2 on my card in addition to his $28 cash.  So in total, we tipped Miss Brookelynne $30!  We leave and get in the car and I see that I have a friend request from our Waitress, Miss Brookelynn. I thought it was odd, so I ignored it.  Not 2 minutes later I see a Facebook post that she tagged me in, I open it to see that this waitress POSTED A PICTURE OF JUST MY SIGNED RECIEPT (signature and FULL name included) the posts says "We don't tip $2 on a $50 tab (my name)".  To which in any other circumstance I WOULD AGREE WHOLE-HEARTEDLY, but in this case this was not true I tipped $2 on my card, yes.... but there was a whole $28 in cash sitting there too honey buns.  So yeah, for posting my signature- on the internet as well as my full name to try to put me "on blast" I will NEVER again eat here or ANY other ON TAP. 1 2 
I went on a Friday night with a large group of coworkers after a long week. It was one of the most horrendous nightlife experiences in the two years I've lived in Vegas. The atmosphere isn't too bad but it isn't too great either. The only major difference I saw from the former Cadillac Ranch / Ranch House is that the mechanical bull was replaced by a small dance floor. As mentioned in previous reviews, the staff is obliterated early on in the evening which makes it challenging to get a drink in under 15 minutes (after you place your order). Prepare to repeat your order several times. The DJ stopped the music periodically to insist all bars be filled with girls (both bartenders and patrons) who would then dance on the bar while the bartenders poured free "shots" directly into patrons' mouths. The shots were in an unmarked bottle and were an odd purple color. Avoid the mystery bottle that just grazed the mouths of 30 other people.Overall, I understand the idea of a party bar but this one missed the mark. The bartenders had more of a party than any of the patrons. Long story short, spend your money anywhere else nearby for better service from staff sober enough to remember your order. 1 2 
Loved the calamari but other food was hit and miss.  Second time which will be the last time was when my husband ordered the Mild chicken wings.  When they were brought to the table I asked him if he had ordered buffalo wings as I could smell the heat in the sauce .  He said no that he had ordered mild.  He hadn't tasted them yet,  When he did taste one he had to put it down.  He flagged the waitress and told her they were not mild and she stated that it was and that their mild was spicy.  No offer to exchange for something else.  Who would expect mild to be spicy??  Another waitress came by for refill and she asked how things were and he said again the chicken was spicier then expected and she said she could tell by the smell that they were hot  and again he mentioned that he had ordered the mild and they were not what he expected.  She politely smiled and walked away.  We ate the other items and he asked for a box to take the wings home as he hates waste.  It was at this time that the original waitress offers  ranch dressing for him to cut the heat and eat them there AFTER we've eaten everything else and are asking for the check as shes dropping off the box.  Not what I would call an honest effort to be helpful because it only came at the time for him to tip.   Completely disappointed with the whole experience.  FYI, I tried the wing and it was  similar to the Buffalo wing sauce, Frank's. 1 2 
There's a golden light that scintillates from this place. It knows of hygiene and cleanliness. I am appreciative. Though, the patissier here is a pretentious she with a head so large I wonder how it fits through the door every morning (figuratively speaking). I walked in to order macarons, this lady did not blink once to withhold her tongue to promptly correct my accent, suggesting I didn't roll my 'r' the way the french do.I'm sorry, I thought I lived in Toronto, a predominantly English-speaking city. Jussayin'.Might I just add, I am fully bilingual, and her accent did not at all come close to the real pronunciation (smh). And then this lady proceeded to say: "Any self-respecting pastry chef knows how to say macaron the correct way" It was callous, and condescending, making me feel very uncomfortable, and belittled. NOT the way a business owner should treat their valuable customers.She must've had God on her side that day. If there wasn't a glass counter filled with maca'R'ons between us, I would've fed her a few open palm wake-up calls. So, though their product may deserve an extra star than I gave credit for, she abates that rating with her temperament, disposition, and ego...WHICH I BELIEVE IS FAIR. You review a business based upon not only their products, but also their service. I got my macarons, the only one worth paying for is the mocha flavoured one, the rest are deplorable, the texture is not what a macaron should be. For someone who is so confident in their macaron expertise, she really falls short in her abilities to prove that. Their viennoiseries such as the croissants are super fluffy & buttery, overly so almost. It oozed transfats. They really do live up do their moniker, 'Butter Avenue'.Just because of her, I'd never return. I'm not trying to go places where I'm disrespected and treated like I've committed the worst crimes known to man.Tip: Go early, they're ALWAYS sold out of their non-macaron items...or DON'T if you don't want to start your day off with a rude glare and a generally sour note. 1 3 
Hole in the wall place that at first glance looks dingy on the inside, forgotten on the outside. Dude at the counter could not stop coughing during my entire order, that should have been a clear signal this place is on life support. Mistakenly didn't order the lunch& went for the Chicken Katsu /Sweet n Sour combo plate (they even throw a ton of rice). The Katsu was old and had zero flavor & below average dipping sauce.  Sweet n Sour chkn was bland and made yesterday. Not recommended nor will I go back voluntarily. 1 2 
Plates were dirty. Coffee cups smells like they were cooking eggs . It makes u feel u dont want to eat eggs anymore. 1 2 
Staff was very friendly, but the dentist called me a liar be because I miss mark something on the form.  This dentist seemed to not know how to pull a fragile tooth. When did dentist become dental monitors? 1 2 
I don't think I will be going back to this place. I was there for over an hour just for a wash and blow dry. And the prices were clearly marked on the pricing board. The lady who did my hair said "oh they put you in for something different" and charged me extra. I was so annoyed that I just paid and left. Also I wanted a specific hair style and was told they didn't know how to achieve it. Less time chatting and more time perfecting your craft and this should help! It was beachy waves I asked for, come on! I did not have a pleasant experience and will NOT be a returning customer, famous hair... I think not. 1 2 
Las Vegas is known for excellent buffets. And I'd been looking forward to trying this one since my other friends have always raved about it. Maybe this was an off night, but it was so bad, I won't give it another shot. Sorry! Maybe we should have taken it as a sign when there was NO line at 7:30pm on a Saturday night. We had prepared ourselves for an hour wait and thought we had scored when we walked right in... WRONG! Let me start with what was good - the shrimp cocktail, the shrimp over cheesy grits, duck ravioli, the prime rib, and the gelato bar. Now for the bad - a lot of the food was stale, probably because there were not enough people eating to cause them to need to make new food. The ribs, korean short ribs were tough and chewy. The crab legs were small and when you were able to get some meat out of them, it was soaked in brine. You could actually squeeze the solution out of the meat, just like a sponge. The fried chicken was chicken wings and they were cold and not crunchy. The spaghetti and lasagna was Olive Garden quality. The dim sum (har gow) was tough and over cooked. The service was slow and deplorable. At one point, we returned to our table and it had not been cleared, so we put the dirty dishes on the clean table next to us. For the rest of the meal, those dirty dishes stayed there and no one cleared them... We even had a bet going on whether they would be cleared before we left! They weren't... This buffet was so horrible, I spent the whole meal pissed that we had spent $42++ per person and this was maybe a step above Hometown Buffet. We should have saved our money and eaten at Golden Corral on the way here! Save your money. Go to the M Hotel for their buffet. 1 2 
I was in town for business and got back to my hotel around 7PM (dinner time). Having work to do for my client, I decided that I would order food to be delivered to my room and chinese food sounded great! I ordered General Tso's Chicken, a small Pork Lo Mein, and the fried dumplings. I thought I was in for a treat as I don't often get the chance to have chinese food. Little did I know, that the food about to be delivered from Taste of China @ 5415B Monona Dr, Monona, WI was horrible.The chicken smelled a little different, but when i tasted it I could tell that it had been left out on the counter for hours instead of being in a cooler prior to preparation. The pork lo mein was OK, so I ate some of it and the dumplings were edible.The next day, I was sick all day. I called the resteraunt and complained when I got back to the hotel and they offered to replace my order. No way was I going to go for round two of the food poisoning game. Instead I told them that I would be posting this review and reporting them to the health department. DO NOT EAT THERE!! YOU WILL BE VERY SORRY THAT YOU DID!! 1 2 
We purchased the suite of Frigidaire appliances (attached) at a cost of over $5000 a little over two years ago. In that time we have had to replace the microwave and now recently have had this major repair on the $2000 refrigerator to the tune of $700. I was well aware that this was outside the one year warranty but I think this is an exceptional circumstance given the design flaw of this major appliance.I have well researched this issue on the web and have talked to a number of Frigidaire service reps (who all ask to remain anonymous interestingly.)  What I have concluded is that a system where a small plastic ice cube tray which is highly likely, if not guaranteed, to break over time releases a sensor that shorts out an entire system which should not and cannot be classified any other way than a design flaw. In addition as I found out, the company has rectified this flaw in subsequent designs which clearly confirms this was an issue in the previous design whether they  deem it a design "improvement" or not per your consumer help line. I also know that there has been no recall due to this issue.I asked the company by phone and letter to cover these repairs or make good on any on this. They turned  me down flat and said since it was more than 1 year it was all my problem. Shoddiest  work I have ever seen. Dont ever buy an Electrolux product if you are smart 1 5 
There are only 2 pros to this hotel - location and shopping. With that being said...Where do I begin? I have had PH on my list of hotels to stay when visiting Las Vegas and I was looking forward to staying there. The pictures on line of course, appeared to be well appointed and contemporary. What the hotel offered was contemporary but worn and torn! The lobby is very misleading. It was clean, vibrant and colorful, which made me excited to see my room. As soon as I hit the elevator and saw the doors close, I knew something was very off. There were scuff marks on the walls of the elevator, scratches and initial carvings in the metal and the doors looked like they had been kicked several times with scratches and dents. Approaching my room, the hall way carpet was torn and stained in several spots, unravelling and bubbled in others. I came to discover during my stay that all the elevators were beat up.I got to my room, the Resort Room, and it was covered in a layer of dust everywhere. There were spill marks on the desk with splatter marks down the leg of it. By that point I was uneasy and checked the bed for bed bugs! I opened the closet to hang my clothes and noticed the wood was chipped all throughout the bureau, with the worst of it where the ironing board was placed. One of the drawers didn't open properly.I called to have the room cleaned and dusted. Throughout my entire stay of 3 days, no one cleaned the spill marks down the table leg. There were chips in the wood on the tables as well.The pool - another disaster! PH charges $118 for reserved day beds. That would be great if the daybeds weren't all stained with mysterious spots, some of them questionably large and obvious. Regular deck chairs are wobbly, with support bands busted off or missing. And since they were supposed to be white, they were visibly dingy.The casino - Signs pointing you where to go are confusing. As a group of 6, we got lost quite a bit, continually walking in circles, even when sober, lol! We actually started paying attention to location markers like light fixtures and escalators as points of reference because the signs were useless. Not to mention, the casino constantly had dirty glasses and beer bottles everywhere. The place just couldn't stay cleaned up. The Strip entrance to the casino was horrid. The glass doors were never clean, with a dirt film of finger and handprints covering the inside and outside.Call me partial, but I love a clean, well appointed hotel, no matter if its cheap or expensive. If I'm paying upwards of $800 for 3 days, I want what I paid for which is high quality, good service and cleanliness. I'm very disappointed with the cleanliness and upkeep of Planet Hollywood. I have stayed in many different hotels on the strip from the Stratosphere to the Bellagio and I will not stay at Planet Hollywood again. I will not recommend it to anyone. 1 2 
I went to Best Buy to purchase a new package on appliances, one of the sales person said that I was going to be next, while I was checking out the appliances I noticed that someone else came up and the started helping them out before me, I'm a Hispanic male so they didn't take me seriously. I did talk to a manager but he couldn't do anything for me. I went across the street to Home depot and they treated me like a customer, so I bought my new appliances there. 1 3 
So, I have to start my review by saying that I am a BIG fan of Babbo's and have been frequenting their restaurant in Surprise since they opened. However, since they changed locations, I have been disappointed multiple times, yet...i keep going back thinking this will get better! Nope, wrong! My husband and I went in a few months ago,  45 min wait, so we approached the bar. There were 3 seats open, we went to sit at 2 of them, and were told they were reserved???? I'm sorry, I thought bar seats were for patrons waiting for a table??? Manager tells us otherwise ...she must have been expecting friends??? Ok, so we like the food, so we now resolve to only order takeout. So....tonight  ( Thurs nite in July...not a busy nite) we order takeout at 6:02. Then receive an email that order will be ready in 20 min. Show up 20 min later only to wait for Another 45 min for my order. In the meantime, the poor girl who has to deal with all of the disgruntled takeout orders...because I am clearly not the only one...decides to be bitchy back to us. Never an "I'm sorry for the wait..." Good food, but awful service and management at this location...bigger isn't always better 1 2 
I walked in here to try it and had a Greenhouse Juicery bottle in my hand and I was asked to put it away.  Please.  I was immediately irritated.  In no way was my juice going to take away from the business I gave to you - until you said that.  Then I ordered less simply because of the rudeness.  Your food is nowhere in the same league so you should take whatever business you can get and be glad anyone stops in. 1 2 
Highly not recommended.1. Sushi rice was as thick as a pillow2. The sashimi on top of the rice pillow was poorly sliced with rips and tears on it3. Sushi was warm4. Waitress didn't even know what they were serving..reminded her our eel sushi hadn't come yet. . And she pointed to a random sushi already on the table and claimed that to be the eel5. The only thing to compliment was the mango pudding dessertOverall, ranked lowest of the ayce Japanese restaurants I've been to. 1 2 
I visited this Capriotti's location at Fort Apache & Tropicana on July 21 around 1pm.  I chose to dine in.  The restaurant was very hot so I don't think a/c was working or it was not turned on.  The workers were sweating.  One kept opening the large refrigerator to fan herself.  The time to receive my meal took way too long.  Looked like they may have been short staffed.  What really blew my mind though was the fact that when I finished my meal I needed to use the restroom & to wash my hands from having a messy sandwich.  I was told that this location does not offer restrooms & that I would have to walk over to KFC to use their restroom.  I said What?!!!!  I am a paying customer & just ate in your restaurant & you cannot offer a restroom?  The worker said no & that's the way it is.  I asked for the manager & was told the same thing.  They do not have restrooms for customers.  I have never heard of such a thing!  I watched as another customer had to walk over to KFC to use their restroom after placing their order.  I was appalled!  There is absolutely no excuse not to offer restroom facilities to paying customers at the very least to wash hands since you are eating a meal there!  I could understand a little if restroom was out of order for a particular reason, but that was not the case.  Needless to say, I will not be back to this location as they obviously do not value their customers.  Bit of advice, if you do visit here, make sure you go to restroom somewhere else beforehand & bring some sanitary hand wipes with you as you will not be able to wash your hands unless you walk over to the KFC which a customer should not have to do. 1 2 
Ugghh. The service makes for an unpleasant experience. Delivered food with no silverware. We had to ask for drink refills, butter, mustard. You name it.. Server was nice enough but just not at all present, so everything was very, very slow.On the good side, my kid liked the gravy. 1 2 
20 minutes late on my pick up, all they had to do was make the pizza I was myOwn delivery boy. I should have got a tip for waiting so long and so patiently. 1 3 
When our waitress was bringing out the food, the plate tilted and grease spilled all over my bag and hat. Needless to say food was overly greasy and salty. They also charged me a few bucks extra for choosing bbq pork as one of the options for the dish but the menu made no mention of extra charge. On top of all that, they placed a mandatory tip of 15% on my bill even when service was crap. 1 2 
Food here is ok but overpriced.  Server asks for our drink order and my wife and I ordered apple juice as it was breakfast time.  Our drinks were brought out immediately and the food 20 minutes later.  While we sat of course we sipped and by the time the food arrived my juice was gone.  I asked for a refill to which I was then told oh no refills on that.  1. How do you bring me a drink 20 minutes before my food and then tell me no refills?  2.  Is there a juice shortage?  It's not expensive for juice quit being greedy.  And 3.  If there are no refills tell us, up front and ask if we want something else or juice when the meal comes.  Very shady and I will not be coming here again 1 2 
Where to begin...I ordered our food (take-out Hibachi) and told them, extra vegetables, hold the rice. When I got home, it was extra rice and not a vegetable in site. My bad, I should have checked but please explain to me why the chicken, steak and shrimp were so over cooked and dry? When you spend over sixty dollars, you have expectations! Everyone's dinner sucked. Perhaps it was just a crappy night, but I doubt I will be headed back anytime soon. 1 2 
Service was poor - waiter brought us a check that was double the amount ours should be and seemed totally confused when we pointed it outFood was only ok - nothing special enough to warrant the price - the nachos were cold and the tuna and salmon were hardly seasoned Worst part - valet returned our car to us after a rain shower during our meal. Got out and handed us the keys only for us to discover the front leather console and seats were drenched with water. Valet admitted to opening the sunroof and letting the water in. Managers response was "well what do you want me to do about it?"We won't go there again 1 2 
Me and my lady used to come to this spot at least once a month for the amazing sushi. This all changed as of last night as we are currently looking for a new spot. Owner and sushi chef were a little hmmmm let's just say messed up from a tiny bit to much drinking, along comes customer to my left ( we sat in the middle of two different groups at the sushi bar ) drinking and having shots with the head chef, some conversation about where they are from is exchanged and then escalates to the head chef cussing him out taking his shirt off to show his tattoos, which ended up in customer to my right coming out of no where and playing referee for customer and Mr Head Chef who has been in jail and is from LA. Now I'm from LA myself and don't need to hear your story about what part your from or what gang you rolled with when you were younger, years in jail etc.  I don't normally go out of my way to write many reviews and I loved this place for years but if you are thinking about going here I would say try somewhere else ! 1 2 
I rarely write reviews but maybe this will help some readers... Two positives-- the good selection of dresses and the very sweet and understanding head of alterations. Other than that, Missy was patient with me... to a point. I'm very indecisive so I was there for a long time trying dresses. I was apologetic for not being able to make up my mind, but at the same time I realize that it is her job to help me. I also work in the customer service industry and understand the importance of making sure the guest has a great experience and feels comfortable, even if it's not ideal for the employee. Missy told me that if I purchased within 24 hours of trying on I could get a 20% off the dress to apply towards alterations or a veil. Because of that alone I "said yes to the dress" and picked out a veil. At checkout my mind was all over the place thinking "Did I make the right choice?! There's no going back now! Oh no! What did I do?!? Blah blah blah..." and I did not realize that they didn't apply the credit towards the veil until later. I figured that it wasn't a big deal thigh because I could still apply that credit towards alterations, but when I went in a few months later the price they quoted me was crazy so we said "no way!" We tried explaining to one of the employees that back in May we were told we would be able to apply the credit to the veil but they made an error on their end and did not apply it. This employee said that she couldn't do anything for us but would have the manager call us. We waited a few weeks to hear back (they were in the process of changing locations so we understood the delay), but when no one ever called us my mom had to call them. She spoke to the manager who still refused, even though giving us this credit on the veil would only take a little bit of work on her end. So much for customer service!! Now we are stuck with a hefty store credit that I don't know if we'll ever get the chance to use, and honestly, I would prefer to not ever return to the store to use it... Moral of the story, if they tell you that you will receive a discount, make sure they apply it!!! 1 3 
I had actually read the reviews before I went so my expectations were super low but they still managed to disappoint.I waited so long for someone to take my drink order that I ended up ordering at the bar. The food was dropped off so quickly that we didn't have a chance to ask for cutlery (and no one noticed we didn't have any). We ended up taking it from another table. When the mains came, they didn't clear the appetizer plates. Then when the desserts came, they didn't remove ANY of the dinner or appetizer plates. Seriously? We also didn't get cutlery for dessert and had to once again pillage another table.  And don't even bother trying to get a glass of water... Bottom line: mediocre food, terrible service. 1 2 
Maybe the "Kid Friendly" should be updated to say NO. FYI I used to love this place, I would go here all the time when I was at university. I grew up...and I had a baby. Now I came back with the stroller on a not so busy Saturday afternoon, only to come in and be told that strollers were not allowed...and it wasn't like I had some gigantic stroller either. There were a few empty tables.Would you have turned away someone in a wheel chair? I don't think so. Absurd. I was so insulted. Way to stick it to your loyal customers. Never going back, and if you have small children I advise you not to go there either. 1 2 
I don't know why I come here. Their buy 1 get 1 promo is misleading. Buying toppings on top make it more expensive than Chatime and their staff have zero personality.  Chatime is busier for a reason. 1 2 
To be fair, the restaurant apparently has a new owner and is presumably under new management. So I do not know if things have changed but hopefully they have. 1 2 
Perfect on the drop off of rented tables and chairs but when it came to pick up on the Monday morning absolutely useless. My wife and I took a day off work with the plan that we would go out for the day once these people had picked up but when I hadn't heard from them by 11.40 I decided to call. The response was we are running behind schedule because Monday's are always busy but we should be there in another couple of hours so there goes our vacation day wasted. I would not recommend this company. 1 2 
Me and my girlfriend went to go eat there for lunch on a Wednesday. We sat down in the bar area. There was maybe 10 customers in the whole place. For about 7 to 10 min no one said hi, or anything. They made eye contact and would walk right by you. Just poor customer service. I could understand if it was busy but it was a ghost town and I could see the workers on there phone. 1 2 
This ramen is all oil. Packaged Ramen is even better than this. The chicken karage is horrible Wendy's chicken nuggets is way better also it is way cheaper than this overpriced crap 1 4 
We thought we would try them through a groupon promotion.  The guy that came out to clean was lucky if he was working on our pool for no more than 5 minutes.  I didn't see him brush the pool and anything on the bottom of the pool stayed on the bottom.  The promotion was for 1 month of cleanings otherwise 4 cleanings.  They called before the 4th cleaning to see if we were going to continue, and when I told them no, they have not been back to do the 4th cleaning.  I called I have been told that they argued with me that my time expired a week earlier, but then after 5 minutes of telling them it hasn't they realized they had the wrong account.  Was told they would be out Monday and now two weeks later have not been out.  I would not recommend this company unless you like giving money away for services not rendered and that you end up doing yourself.  They talk a great game but follow through is horrible. 1 2 
Both my mom and I ordered the New slow roasted sliced sirloin and it ended up being tough, chewy, and too rare for us! Our baked potatoes were very over done and we couldn't eat those either. It was difficult to get our servers attention after he brought our food to the table and disappeared so my mom (who is handicapped) flagged down another server who was rude. We then asked to speak to the manager (who was on the phone.) When she finally came out to the hostess station, she said they could cook us something else, but she seemed annoyed and really didn't care, defending her cooks and time potatoes were in the oven. We walked out, without eating or wanting to chance another bad meal. Quality has really gone downhill and my husband and I used to rave about their steaks. And, my mom (who doesn't eat out much) was so disappointed after our experience at this location. 1 2 
My family and I went to Aji Sai last weekend for lunch. They renovated their FOTH and it looks pretty decent. They also printed new menus since the last time we were there. We've always enjoyed coming to this place in the past, but we had a different experience this time.Food:- Their wakame salad (a cooked seaweed salad) is tasty. - Their fish does not taste fresh and has a mushy texture- Their rolls have very very little flavour (the spicy salmon rolls has NO taste. It's not even a bit spicy).- They do not have shrimp tempura during lunch service (whereas Sushi on 7, Maison du Japon, Yang's Kitchen all do)- Soft drinks are not included in the price (whereas again, the other AYCE restaurants nearby do)Service:- Servers are indifferent-- I don't mind, as long as you bring the food- Servers don't bring food. I think this is the problem. It's happened more than once. They bring the first round quickly, but the second round either takes forever, or does not come AT ALL. We waited 30 minutes for the second round orders, and finally gave up because we got full from sitting and waiting. When we told the manager to cancel or order and to just give us the bill, he looked annoyed and asked us what we ordered, and when told that we don't want it anymore and just the bill, he walked off w/o saying anything. Had to ask for the bill a second time. Hmm.I'm a low maint. kind of guy. I ain't rich, I don't go to high class restaurants, I don't care about decor-- I just don't like getting shafted.By the way, it definitely is a popular and busy restaurant. But look around you when you go.. you'll see that going to Aji Sai for Japanese food is kind of like going to Mandarin for Chinese... 1 2 
We went to this restaurant yesterday, and I should have read the yelp reviews. I would have passed.We arrived relatively early because we were going to see a play at the Royal Alexandria.  Service was nice and friendly and for the most part prompt. The decor was warm, inviting and modern. I was really excited to try this place out. We ordered the deep fried calamari and shrimp. While it was cooked well and breaded tastily, it did not come with any dipping sauce. I've never not been served dipping sauce with this dish, so it was really quite boring after the 5th piece.My cousin ordered the $30 Buonanotte pizza. For $30, canned, squishy mushrooms is NOT acceptable. She loves mushrooms and has to leave them on the side. She did say the dough was cooked well.I ordered the seafood pasta. For $26 the portion was quite small. All my 7 mussels were out of their shells (but they still put the empty shells in the bowl?? I got 1 shrimp and 3 pieces of calamari. The sauce was SUPER oily and the pasta was ridiculously undercooked. I know al dente, and this was like al dente's frigid aunt forgotten outside after a night of partying (aka super dehydrated). Now, I am a pretty passive aggressive person (hence, writing a review in lieu of making a fuss in the restaurant), however, I really would have liked to bring this to the chef's attention if we weren't in a rush to make it to the play. I needed SOMETHING to eat and was seriously contemplating the street meat at the corner of John and King St.Anyway, will not be going back and will be telling all my friends to avoid this place. I don't know how they will make it with food lacking this much. 2 3 
Mixed Bag. Used the transit system on a Saturday as a tourist. Here's what I liked: The day pass was $10.75 for our family, pretty reasonable. The subway was clean. I didn't see any rats like I saw in NYC. The drivers/operators were helpful and friendly. The announcements of upcoming stops were clearly announced audibly and visually. The map (when we found one) w/ routes was clear and easy to follow. Here is what I didn't like: The TTC map was not available at the Spadina 7-11 store where we purchased the pass. We looked for maps at the Subway station and could not find a rack dispensing it. The attendant was not present. The day pass is not a card you swipe at the turnstiles and busses like the Metrocard in NYC. The pass is a flimsy ticket, by the end of the day it was pretty beat up. When we went to ride the subway at the first station, there was not an attendant to show the pass to, so we stood around with other tourists looking confused a minute and then my husband just tried the turnstile and we walked through. The subway is not as expansive as NYC. I think there are only two lines. You have to walk to an island in the middle of the street to catch some streetcars. Delays for streetcars. We had to wait a half hour for most. Then when one came, there was another close behind. They were clumped together. One was running late while we were on it, and had to abort it's route. 2 3 
I wasn't a bride shopping here, but my best friend was and I have DEFINITELY been to better places with other friends. My friend found her dress fairly quickly and was very excited about it. I went with her 2 or 3 times after she found her dress. Once, to see her in the dress. And the other times were for alterations. Holy rude service :-( My poor friend! She is one of the sweetest, patient people I know and I was sad to see Vera's consultants treating her so rudely. On my friends wedding day, the buttons for her bustle broke off within 20 minutes. When she told Vera's about it, they said there would be a charge to fix it! A charge to fix something that should have been more durable on Vera's end in the first place! Vera herself seems very sweet...but her consultants are lacking in charm and grace. I hope this improves for any other future brides that decide to buy from there. 2 1 
Called in an order for delivery to my home, 2 miles from the shop.  Medium, 3-ingedient pizza and a small greek salad...$33 and change!  Add to that the five bucks I would give the delivery guy and I'm into it for just shy of $40.  Their pizza is o.k., but not even close to the quality that would command that price.  I know, delivery charge, taxes, blah blah blah...it's just a bottom line issue...waaay too much for an average pizza.  Sorry Rosati's, but we're done. 2 1 
My boyfriend & I went to Jozo yesterday after the gym and thought to check this place out since we've been seeing a lot of hype. The place is nice and quiet. Menu has a good variety of options from boba to coffee to smoothies. We ordered two drinks which was the Classic Taiwanese Milk Tea and the Signature Thai Tea. Milk tea was alright, it wasn't as sweet nor milky as most boba places. Thai tea was just like your regular Thai tea that you get at restaurants. And the boba was unusually smaller than your regular boba which was surprising coming from a boba place.What was really disappointing was the amount of ice that was in the drink! My boyfriend and I took two sips of the milk tea to try the flavor and noticed that the cup was pretty much ice! The 12oz cup (not even the bottle) was filled with 2/3 ice & 1/3 tea. I know it's being nit picky but I feel like I got gypped paying $4.50. Mind you, they were out of their cool bottles which comes standard with their drinks and still payed for the same price for a plain regular plastic cup - no name or anything. Overall, I think Jozo is jumping in with the trend of hipster branding but is lacking quality on the flavor. Wish I had a better experience! 2 3 
The place is overrated... It's a full service salon that is dramatically overpriced considering the quality of their service. 2 3 
I looked forward to visiting rock salt since its opening. Finally had the opportunity this past weekend and unfortunately, I was very disappointed. The restaurant was moderately full but certainly not jammed with patrons.  My wife and I were greeted quickly and offered either indoor or outdoor seating. We opted for outdoor due to my wife's previous experience with the noise level inside. After 10 minutes our waitress took drink order. She returned 15 minutes later to ask if we were ready to order dinner although we were still waiting for our drinks. She apologized that they only had one bartender. One bartender on a weekend dinner service running 25 minutes behind?We ordered oysters and smoked trout roe as appetizers. Oysters were arguably the smallest oysters I have ever seen, smaller than a typical cherry stone clam. The roe was good but served with a bag of potato chips, a bag of potatoes chips for $29!I had the fish of the day which was amberjack and my wife had the scallops. She enjoyed the scallops very much. The amberjack however was cold and raw in the middle. I typically enjoy fish medium but this was actually raw and drowning in salt. Served with Swiss chard that was also so heavily salted as to be inedible.  We finished quickly and moved on to dessert elsewhere, leaving the menus that the waitress had never bothered to pick up from our table behind. Great concept, very poor execution 2 1 
Good location. Cramped but cute interior. Bland yet salty ramen. Toppings were eh (overcooked/bland). Service: only one person looked like they knew what they were doing. Their system of seating and taking orders could be improved upon. 2 3 
I am NOT a restaurant snob.  In general I think Buca is great, with decent food, big portions, and a fun atmosphere to hang out with friends.But the service at this particular location was pretty bad.  We stopped by to get lunch before a Pirates game, but the place was packed and the line was really long.  We tried again for dinner after the game, and again the wait was very long.  We only got a table right away by being one of the few groups willing to sit on the patio after a very hot day out in the sun.Our pitcher of sangria came pretty quickly, but we had to spend a good ten minutes staring at it longingly before we got any glasses we could use to actually drink it.  We never got any bread, which I'm pretty sure they automatically serve to every table, right?  None of our drinks were ever refilled (not even the water, which sort of sucked; see above about spending the previous 4 hours in bleacher seats in direct sun).  Our food came after a pretty long wait, and was typical Buca food- tasty by my standards, anyway!  We ordered dessert, but our brownie sundae had no brownies.  That was a pretty big letdown, let me tell you.Mostly I felt bad for the servers.  It's not like they were just standing around while we waited for food, they were constantly running back and forth and looked really stressed.  There was a big group at the table next to us (a bachelorette party, I think) and they didn't get several of their dishes until well after everyone else at their table had finished eating.  Understandably they sent them back.  Between running to serve all of her tables and trying to apologize to this angry group about a problem that wasn't even her fault, their poor waitress was in tears by the time we left.From my experience and other reviews, it seems like they are chronically understaffed.  It is a very busy location in a very popular area, and it sounds like the management has not gotten that memo.  The end result is that the customers end up entertaining themselves while they wait for their food by chatting with the other tables about how bad the service is.  That WAS at least entertaining, but not exactly the reason I stopped by. 2 3 
We are frequent visitors of the HT franchise. We were excited to try the new one here in Indian Trail. Sadly, this restaurant is not up to Hickory Tavern standards.  Restaurant is too small. Tables are on top of each other. There isn't a separation from bar to dining area. After waiting for 20 mins for a seat in the "dining room " we we jammed in up against the bar stools.  We were dining with a toddler, which can be challenging. After placing our order our waitress did not return. After waiting 45 minutes I did seek out a manager. Our food was brought out finally !  Portions seem smaller than a typical HT. Meal literally came with six fries. The server actually remarked that my burger was sadly lacking bleu cheese crumbles.   At this point with a screaming, tired, toddler we just wanted to leave. 2 1 
Bland bland bland! I was thoroughly unimpressed. Although the portions were huge, there was absolutely no flavor to the food- just bland chicken and cheese inside an overly fried shell. I will not be returning 2 1 
We ordered a carry out thin crust pizza which was ready on time and accurate.  The online ordering process is very efficient and great when you want to get a pizza quickly and take it home.  I like the thin crust and it was done correctly but they were very stingy on the ingredients.  The tomato sauce was not spread across the entire pizza making the outer pieces somewhat dry.  The amount of crumbled Italian sausage was minuscule and I could barely taste the onions or mushrooms.  They did get the half sausage and half anchovies correct and those were in appropriate amounts.  I like Domino's pizza but was disappointed in the overall taste. 2 3 
If there is one consistent character about this particular coffee bean- it  is INCONSISTENCY in quality and service.  I use the drive thru a lot and it feels like my simple order is never right.. Creating an issue where I have to park and ask to have it remade correctly, or ask for the correct size I ordered and paid for.  I really want to like this place..  It's the closest coffee shop near my house as I'm on my way to work.  I just went through with my husband on our way to the other side of town..and once again the sub par quality is disappointing.  Both of our orders were wrong again.  Yuck. 2 1 
We went here for a friend's birthday dinner and did the restaurant week menu. I was severely disappointed. The amount of food and the quality of food is really not up to par. The steak that we were served was cold. I've had much better sushi on Ventura Blvd. Avoid this place. Overrated. 2 1 
I went there for the first and last time last night. The food was ok.The service was very bad. We were a group for a b-day dinner. We brought a cake with us and They cut the cake before singing happy birthday, if that's not bad enough, they tried to charge us 2$ for each piece of cake for cutting it!?!They tried to convince the birthday girl that her meal was the entree size rather then appetizer even after she told them about her doubts. It took the manager to convene to get her the right dish. When asked for an empty wine glass they brought a filled one and charged for it.There was also very few choices for the vegetarian guests.The manager was nice enough to try to fix everything by giving shots to everyone but it was far from smooth sailing all night! Good thing they have wine for Saq prices. 2 1 
Tons of picture dics.  Many records that you would find in dollar bins, priced like they were new.  But, I guess if your the only store in town...Thank G I dont live in Vegas. 2 3 
I have ordered albos 3 times while visiting Las Vegas. The food is affordable and tasty. That said the people on the phone don't seem to understand what people expect out of a cashier at a delivery place. The person seemed more interested in making me laugh than making sure my order was right and they could deliver it. This time my delivery driver was kicked out of my hotel and I had to come to the entrance to get my food. If I wanted to walk through my hotel I wouldn't have ordered delivery, I would have gotten food from the food court.The previous time I ordered they had no problem getting into our room but we discovered on the receipt had my ENTIRE CREDIT CARD NUMBER, EXPIRATION DATE, CC2 CODE, AND ZIP WRITTEN ON THE RECEIPT. The driver kept a copy. This is completely unacceptable as it invites identity theft.The person answering the phone also seems very distracted and set the phone down twice (for 5 min or so each time) to take an order from a customer in the store rather than taking the minute or two to finish our transaction or placing me on hold to deal with the in store customer.In short fast, cheap, food with a very poor execution. 2 3 
Staff is very nice. Food is waaaay over priced. My wife got wings and they may have been the worst chicken wings I've ever tasted at a restaurant. Frozen Tyson wings taste the same. We got the filet mignon nachos and I'd love to see the "filet mignon" they used. Food gets 1 star. Staff gets five. Edited this review. Staff is nice but it's taking forever to get the check. Legitimately 15-20 mins after we were done eating. 2 1 
I liked the price for a mani/pedi $30.  I did not like a man doing a mani/pedi, I like a little conversation.  He almost clipped my cuticle too far. Also,  I do not think the place used sanitized tools.  I should have left.  That is big for me.  I have gotten toenail fungus from a different shop that did not sterilize. I asked if  he used sterilized tools & he acted like he didn't understand what I asked. He did a good job of applying the polish. 2 3 
We had to wait an hour for mediocre food. The manager comped our drinks, but should've comped our whole meal. Won't be coming back here anytime soon. It's too bad because this was not our first time here. 2 1 
Just food for when you get hungry. Don't expect much. In keeping with Mandalay bays high prices, you will be overpaying for everything you get. 2 3 
My wife and I came here trying to diversify our restaurant portfolio.  Food across the board was okay.  Lettuce a little brown, rolls very out of bag from store feeling.  Many things lacked flavor when the creative names and combos made me expect something bold.  I'm not sure what some of the yelpers liked so much ?  The snickers pie was blah.  My salad was plain.  My wifes quiche was like a frozen pot pie. I liked my app, but not so much I'd order it twice.  The only thing we like was our butter finger shake, but madison has a few thousand places to get custard.  Our server was nice and helpful, but lacked courage in guiding our selection.  Not a awful experience, but not very good.  Would not give 2nd try. 2 3 
The room was ok. Very basic, but we were only using it to spend one night and we got a deal for $22 through Trivago.I don't really have any complaints about the room. Was small but clean. There was a shuttle to the strip. We got off at the Flamingo. What I have a problem with is the staff and how they handled (or didn't handle) a barking dog. I called the ask if they could get the person in the room next to me to please have their dog quiet down. They sent down security, by the time they got there the go's had stopped barking. Fast forward 2:30 in the morning. Dog STILL barking. I call back down there, get told it's a pet friendly hotel and there's nothing they can do. Not acceptable. This darn dog barked ALL. NIGHT. 2 3 
Been here 3x and no beef #45, will stop coming; what's the point if it's always out. Take it off the menu since it's never available. Portions getting smaller, prices going up. And the table that came after us got to order first. 2 1 
mediocre food, asshole servers (but thats the charm?) personally i dislike being treated badly, especially after 2 days in vegas, hungover, tired, and hungry... entertaining, but hope to NEVER go backhad very well priced special menu for sunday football some fat guy with a tattoo that said "TACO" on his beer belly was quite vulgar and unappetizing...he was also wearing a black thong which he proceeded to pull out of his pants so everyone could see the straps.... you looked better with your shirt ON buddy... yuk 2 1 
Had the brisket sandwich. What can I say about it? Bleh. Never coming back here again. the brisket was so charred and dry I couldn't eat half the meat in the sandwich. And it was really greasy and salty. Usually I like the fat on brisket but this fat was just gross salty greasy and hard. The bun was good tho. That's the only think I actually liked. Very disappointing. The restaurant was hot and very dingy. The girls were nice. The bbq sauce isn't the best I had but it helped cover up the taste of the brisket. 2 1 
Tonight was my first and last visit to this restaurant.  A friend had recommend we give it a try, so my wife, mother-in-law, and myself decided we would go on their recommendation.  There were very few cars parked outside the restaurant, which should have tipped me off.  In the end, the service was very slow - not sure why, but they may have simply been understaffed.  The waiter was nice and polite, but we ran out of chips and had to ask to get more, and then had to wait a long time for our check at the end of the meal.  All three of us thought the food was very subpar.  I had cheese enchiladas, which are kinda hard to mess up, but they were dry and had a weird taste.  The rice was not very good, and was also very dry.  The refried beans were the best part of the meal, which my mother-in-law agreed with.  My wife had the vegetable plate, and thought it was passable, but nothing to write home about.  We all gave it a thumbs down and agreed it would not be worth it to come back.  We had just gone to Arriba for mexican food just a few days ago, and found it to be a few steps above El Palacio.in addition, they do not allow firearms into the restaurant, so if you are a law abiding concealed-carry kind of person, you should know that you are not welcome at this restaurant...another reason for a less then stellar review. 2 1 
Manager did not care about my experience. Mindy, the server was amazing and friendly and always smiling. Unfortunate that the manager was so flippant and unhelpful 2 3 
I cannot understand the raves for this place.  The forgettable experience began before we even got through the door.  The heavy glass door does not swing easily but the three staff member standing just inside just stared without offing assistance.   The service never got any better.  The hostess was better suited for an Outback, too casual and familiar for a place with $50 lobster.Our waitress finally sashayed over with an air of condensation, like we should know who she once was but isn't now.  Neither the waitress nor the helper cold find the energy to step around next diner when serving the plates and drinks.  He was probably never taught how to serve, she was probably just lazy and annoyed. Did I mention that there were only three other diners, a booth of two and a table of one.The food was fine, exactly what should be expected for those prices.  I had duck and shrimp tacos.  This first visit will be our last! 2 1 
The food and beer tasted good, but overpriced. German street food at a premium. The waitress steered us to more expensive choices, but not necessarily better choices. It felt more like a rainforest cafe experience than the authentic Hofbrauhaus, which I visited several years ago. Not a bad choice, but trust your instinct on the menu! Cheers! 2 3 
Stopped in with my son to get lunch on a weekend last month. We found a booth right away, which is nice. We sat for some time waiting to have our order taken and we watched while a waitress cleaned other tables before she took our order.  It wasn't busy. I ordered the greek salad and my son, a bacon cheeseburger.  The greek salad was a large portion but wasn't anything to write home about. Not much flavor. My son's cheeseburger was "ok" Our waitress didn't seem to have much "flavor" either and she didn't really seem to care about our dining experience. We sat for a while before we realized that we had to pay our bill up front.I walked over to grab a fountain drink recently 15 minutes before closing, and the door was locked with customers inside. When I tried to open the door, that same waitress (the blond one) just looked over and then ignored me. 2 3 
1. I went to your store yesterday with a 50% off coupon.  Could not use it on an adult coloring books.  I looked around the store for something else but even with the coupon I found most items are pricey.  You have too many restrictions on coupons.   2. I have purchased items from 50% signage and when checking out the discount is more like 40%.  3. There is not enough staff on floor to answer questions. 2 1 
had a $20 slow cooked pork dish (cochinito pibil) that was described as a house speciality.  Nothing special.  Salty, a little dry...lots of spices. Obvious sauce drips on plate rim were partially wiped off...made the plate look unapetizingly dirty at first.  The $7 Modelo tasted great! 2 3 
used to have good wings in the past; however, last couple of times--ordered the thai wings--really dry and tasteless (seemed refried and had no meat or sauce on them); since then, have been avoiding this place; lots of better places for wings. 2 1 
10$ for a 3 piece tender meal.  I got the world's smallest tenders. Definitely not worth the price. Very disappointed.  They didn't even offer to switch out tenders.. 2 1 
First off the customer service in this place is great.I walked in to the mac shack wanting and hoping for a warm, cheesy, goodness that would be the next new level in my mac and cheese arsenal.so I ordered the "smoke house" mac and cheese, which by the description from the menu sounded ridiculous. I was pumped, I thought to my self man this is going to be epic!!!also got the garlic bread (because I love some good garlic bread) so I sat down in there very well done restaurant areaThen a short time after I got the soup...I mean mac ... well it could have passed for soup. looking at it stomach rumbling I take a bite, instantly an overwhelming taste of very sweet bbq sauce hit my taste buds and not a hint of the smoked gouda as promised from the menu. The dish resembled vodka sauce and mac elbows, no cheese and so much soupy sauce that I could soke it up with the garlic butter covered little Cesar's style bread sticks.after about 6 bites I gave up and abandoned the dish.I do really wish that I would have had a better experience at this fast casual restaurant. maybe the cook needs to be retrained or replaced either way they wont getting any $13 lunches from me. to me first impressions are everything and should be. this places food did not impress me in the slightest. 2 4 
Delivery was fast. Got a free Sweet potato roll, but that couldn't take away from a rancid flavour and very wet almost mushy rice in the sushi. 2 3 
I don't understand how so many people have had great experiences with the owner. He gets grumpy when we use a card instead of cash and it's not like we're placing a piddly order -- we're buying more than enough to justify it. I prefer to get the food to go (I love the tzatziki) but recently decided to eat in and realized I won't ever do that again. I had ordered Greek fries but received regular fries instead. When I mentioned this to the waitress, who was really nice, she told the owner who then complained about me in the nearby kitchen. I like to think that cashiers, waiters, and customer service people in general appreciate my patience and kindness but this guy makes me feel like it's such a hassle for him to even bother with me. I had another bad experience ordering lunch today and I'm done with this place...I just don't get it. :( 2 1 
I was at this particular Popeyes, about an hour ago. I'm more of a KFC kind of person but, I was right by and decided to give it a try. I drove up to the speaker box on their drive thru lane; I was immediately greeted, I was offered to listen to their specials, I ordered a special combo with chicken, fries, a biscuit & a drink for $4.99. I asked the order taker if it was possible for her to hold the biscuit and substitute for fries instead, she kindly said it wasn't possible, so I said that's fine just hold the biscuit; I wasn't going to eat it, & I didn't want it to go to waste.. Before completing my order I asked her to upsize my drink to a large, and so I thought she did. When drove up to the window, she was nice, but not enthusiastic, just the minimum.. I paid she gave me my drink a SMALL drink, and when I got home I opened the box & the first thing I see is a golden buttery BISCUIT. I rated my overall experience 2 stars, because the service was fast, but my order wasn't correct due to the lack of attention to detail. From other reviews I've read it seems the employees should be oriented on customer service. 2 4 
A bit disappointing.  The food is edible, but nothing to swoon over. Its a trendy little spot that relies on hipsters. Think white guys in sweater vests wearing Kangol hats with women in pashminas and colorful cowboy boots. The bartenders appeared to be required to mix all their drinks over their heads.To call the food there Mexican would be a bit of a stretch. Possibly Mexican inspired or if you want to stick with trendy nomenclature Mexican fusion, but definitely not something that makes you think that there is a pack of a Mexicans in the kitchen. The mole sauce on my dish was quite thin and bland, and the yucca fries were tragically flavorless. The chicken was well cooked but poorly seasoned. The side of black beans was delicious but seasoned in a way that make me think of India, not Mexico.The dinner was by no means unpleasant, but I'm not going to be racing to get back there. 2 3 
The food was all right, nothing too outstanding about it and nothing too bad about it. The service was all right. I find that the price was a bit much. I can understand paying extra if they were including their hot pot in the price, but they don't; they charge extra. 2 3 
Was looking forward to having a late dinner here and all was going well. Ordered the Greek salad, potato wedge and falafel box. Wedges were okay pretty sure they were cooked from frozen as they had a mash potato mouth feel, seasoning was decent though. Greek salad was iceberg lettuce with peppers, onions and a few small black olives (also both the "me-salad" and the Greek came with the same vinaigrette). Finally we get to the falafels... Looked pretty great but they were basically chickpea-ran-through-it doughnuts. Wasn't a fan of the taste or texture, soft spongy with that distinct timbit taste. Tahini sauce was runny and flavourless. Maybe I'm being picky as the rest of my table enjoyed their dishes, but I'd rather go to one of a thousand hole in the wall shawarma places than come back here. 2 3 
My boyfriend is kind of a down home, "we love Amurrica" kind of guy, It's part of his charm, it's what I love about him, but the kind of cuisine that accompanies this quality isn't my cup of tea. I rarely eat red meat. I avoid fried foods whenever possible. That being said, I like to see my man happy - a knife in one hand, a fork in the other, and a big plate of Western goodness between the two. TEXAZ seemed perfect. I read reviews, (not on Yelp, unfortunately), scoped out the location, and surprised him by taking him there a few months ago. I, for one, loved the atmosphere. It was loud, a little rowdy, and filled to the ceiling with junk! An eclectic assortment of ephemera clung to the walls, accented with knick-knacks and taxidermied animals here and there. Imagine the inside of an Applebee's, except 10 times darker and decorated with items people actually accumulated over time, not stuff that came out of some corporate "wacky interiors!" starter kit. The waitress was pleasant, but inattentive. The portions were huge, but bland. Even the biscuits were especially boring, and it's hard to make a buttermilk biscuit any more boring than it naturally is, just by existing. I tried to score some honey mustard to liven up my tasteless chicken entree, but no go - no sauces were available! What?! Even my boyfriend seemed less than thrilled by his big ol' meaty hunk of meat, served with a side of some bland starch or another. My boyfriend also found the beer selection to be lacking, but I can't vouch for the accuracy of this observation as I do not care about beer in the slightest. For what it was, it was pricey. I felt like we could've gone to almost any other sit-down restaurant in a 2 mile radius and had a better experience for less cash. We left full, but with nothing good to say other than "my, that was a lot of food." Hardly ringing praise for a $50+ dinner bill. I don't think we'll be back...the lure of the 1970s concert posters and deer skulls isn't enough to justify a second visit. 2 3 
They have some delicious mulitas!!! I've been coming here for over a decade and the last 2 times I had bad experience . The first time was they but way too much ice on my raspado and charged me extra for additional fruit and they didn't put the extra fruit . Btw everything is expensive here which I don't mind paying . I came another time after that and the pineapple was bitter, the mango was old and squishy and the strawberries were sour , I am so disappointed . Their raspado game is weak now . So I will be looking for a new raspado place . But I will still keep coming for the food 2 3 
My wife and I have been a member of the gym for over 4 years.  While the freeweight area is nice, the powered equipment has gone way downhill over the last 6-8 months.  3 of 4 bikes do not turn on/work at all.  3 of 6 treadmills don't turn on, the 3 that do may or may not incline, and every single treadmill has a ripped seam in the tread, some are to the point of posing the potential of tripping.  1 of 3 ellipticals are out of order and the one that remains is a machine that most avoid after giving it a try, it's just not a good machine.  It's frustrating to know that the $90 per month isn't being used to repair the equipment that is the reason for our membership.  Yes, most of the machines are outdated - but at this point I would be pleased just to have them be functional.I would email the owner but they have no website or email listed anywhere, and when we are there in the off-hours it's just an hourly employee using facebook behind the desk. 2 1 
Found the staff to be rather rude, maybe they are just used to dealing with unsavory people when it comes to complimentary drinks and gaming at the bar. Maybe they are burnt out and need young blood and energy behind their bars. We moved to a little bar across the street next to a liquor store that had some cheap drinks and good bartenders. A real dive, but if you like dives this one is a great find considering the location.   Then made out way to the Cromwell. 2 3 
I am debating 1 or 2 stars.... I am not a very picky person - it doesn't take much to make me happy. However, I have had my car cleaned at various Danny's and I am honestly never happy. The job is less than average, but sometimes I just want a cleaner car, quick and easy. There are always spots missed, sometimes I take time to point them out and they get addressed, other times, I just want to be on my way. Today we got "The Works". The guy said our window was chipped and if we signed up to get it replaced through them, today's wash would be free. We declined and noted that there were no chips. I always detest the window repair piece.... They didn't do much of a vacuum job and didn't bother to clean out the cup holders. I pulled the Dyson out to the garage and did it myself when I returned home, on Mother's Day. I also cleaned out the cup holders and retreated the leather seats. $15.99 for what they did and 30 minutes more of my own labor, it looks nice now. 2 1 
I used to come frequently until one day the food became inedible. Today, after more than a year, I decided to give it another try. Warm pop, inedible taboule salad and ok shawarma. 2 1 
Feeney's used to be a wonderful restaurant.  However, I have not enjoyed the last 3 meals I received there.  You should get more than 4 shrimp in the shrimp scampi for the price, there is simply something wrong with the cheese on the pasta, and the I had to throw away the last steak because it was just fat.  Hopefully, things will improve in the future. 2 3 
Food *** - Service *** - Ambience ****Fairly mediocre food. Their curries are palatable but no matter what curry you off of their menu, they all taste the same. At $10 a curry, and for that portion size, they are fairly over priced. The ambience and staff are ok. Restaurant is quite clean.I would go back here if I had no other options. 2 3 
I decided to try this Salon based on the reviews and I was disappointed. The salon was very nice inside and clean.  However I was disappointed in my stylist who I felt had no idea what she was doing.  I went in for a simple trim and my hair came out uneven.  I also noticed they l'oreal hair products, that doesn't exactly scream high class salon to me. 2 3 
Christmas Eve / Morning. Only place open in town. Understaffed, extremely slow service. The ladies room smells of sick so profusely that it can be smelled strongly in the vestibule. The hostess is oblivious as to why they are so busy (not even half full). One egg over cooked and the other under. 2 1 
The views are fabulous down at Harbourfront and this place tops it when it comes to views.  We waited 15-20 min on a Sat which isn't bad. But they sat us at a really dirty (filthy) table. They came to clean it but it was still dirty. We moved inside. The menu is rather simple. Very very little in terms of vegetarian or vegan options. Add a gluten free or vegan option and this place would come up a notch. Coffee selections poor. Bathrooms not quite up to what they should be. Staff friendly. We preferred the IL fornello by far.  This place could be great and I hope they give attention to a few finer details. Some of the nicest summer views in the city! 2 3 
First time ordering from this location...and most likely my last. This review is based on the delivery and customer service, not the food. I use to deliver pizza when I was younger (before everyone had GPS on there phone) and if I was lost, I either called my boss or the customer to get directions so I could get there on time...no excuses for a cold pizza nowadays in my opinion. Well, to start things out...the driver took an hour and 20 minutes to deliver, didn't have my credit card receipt, then wanted to copy down my whole credit card number! I wasn't ok with that...(I started calling the store to confirm that policy and then she changed her story and said she only needed the last 4 digits!) and to top it off...she didn't even have a pen for me to sign her delivery receipt! So I was left with a cold pizza, cold chicken poppers, no receipt for my transaction and a bad taste in my mouth about Papa John's. I use to love this pizza, but today made me reconsider that. There's way too many choices in pizza to have to put up with this kind of service. I called the store after the driver left and the manager was apologetic and offered a free pizza on my next order but it didn't make up for the fact that my dinner was ruined. I gave it two stars because I'm sure the food would have been fine had it been hot. Customer service can make or break a business. I hope they figure that out soon over there. 2 1 
Stayed here because it's one of the lesser expensive places on the strip.We booked online a couple of months in advance.  When we go to check in (which was a zoo, but the lines moved along fairly quickly) we were told that the room was paid for but that they needed our credit card for the $8 resort fee (!!!!??)  I knew some of the resorts had fees but it said so on their site!  I never saw anything about a resort fee when we booked so that ticked me off.  We were famished by the time we got in (flew in from oakland) and had met up with some friends so we went over to Rock & Ritas for a bite to eat.  Decent margaritas, food was so so, definitely not worth what they charged for it, but it was ok.  Checked into our room. I was pleased to find that it had a large bathroom, but our view was terrible.  We were on the 3rd floor of the Skyrise Tower and had a view of the roof.  Meh, get what you pay for I spose.  The bed was surprisingly comfy, but smelled slightly of cigarettes.  Thanks to the very loud A/C, I didn't get but 2 hours of sleep that night.  Only blew air about 30% of the time and it wasn't even cold air so our room was not only noisy, but muggy the entire night.  We tried turning it off but then it got even hotter so we just dealt with the noise. (not good when I had to fly home and be to work the next day!)The Adventuredome was not what I remembered it 10 years ago during my first trip to Vegas.  The sign said open til midnight and we got there around 4 and when we went to get the wristbands we were told they were only open until 6 and if we wanted to stay til midnight it's an extra $10 (some sort of halloween fest).  We said forget it and used our free ride coupons we got upon checkin to ride the rollercoaster and left. The midway was the typical Circus Circus midway, with the games and shows.  I was disappointed to see that the carousel bar was out of service.We didn't gamble here (we went down the strip) so I can't review their games.For the price and how little we stayed in the rooms it was ok.  I will definitly try other places next time I'm in town. 2 3 
Came here for lunch excited for some bbq. Saw the reviews and thought I was worth a shot. Ordered the wing and onion rings as an app. The wings were great with good flavor and no extra fat. The blue cheese was so watered down I ate the wings without it. The onion rings were good but nothing extra special.My fiancee ordered the pulled pork plater with Mac and cheese and baked beans. The pulled pork was cold with no flavor. The sweet bbq sauce we added on was watered down with now spice. The hot bbq sauce wasn't hot at all and again no flavor. The mac and cheese was more like soup and feel like they forgot to bake it. It was very bland and needed tons of salt to even eat. The baked beans also had zero flavor but had large pieces of pork in them. Wish they were warm and had salt because it had potential. Overall we were not impressed with the bbq and would recommend going to Mac's instead. I would come back for the wings but even then I would take them home and use my own blue cheese. 2 3 
I went to Queen Margherita as a corporate outing and was very excited to try out this pizza spot (HUGE PIZZA LOVER). I was starving and still had quite a few people to wait for before ordering so I asked the male waiter if there were any appetizers available as there weren't any on the menu. Very rudely he snaps at me and says "let me tell you how this menu works so you understand!" .. I was taken back by this as to me it was a simple question. He then points to a chalk board BEHIND ME and explains the prix fix menu with the choice of appetizers on the chalk board.. BEHIND ME... As if I can see behind me or even know the chalk board is a menu. I then asked for water, and I had asked for a straw.. Apparently that is too much since he snarled at me "YOU NEED A STRAW FOR YOUR WATER?!" .. I thought yes, that's why I asked for one but simply replied "yes, please." By this time I was still very hungry and not impressed with this location but it was a corporate event and the option of leaving was not realistic. Aside from the unnecessary attitude the food was really good and I absolutely loved the Vegetarian Pizza. The Citrus Salad they offered at the time was incredible and the Caramel Funnel Cake as dessert.. opted for Ice cream with it (additional 3$) which was half a scoop.. no point in asking the staff for anything else since they were unpleasant. Nonetheless the food was really good and I recommend you order ice cream with your funnel cake.. wasn't as pleasant when the half scoop was gone.. When it came to the bill, our waitress started to complain to my manager that she's been waiting on tables all day and is too "crazy" and the system is "too much" for her to separate the bills when this was requested at reservations.. All in all I just wish I had a better experience at this location since I love pizza, the food was incredible and the environment was indeed cozy. Because of this horrible service I probably won't return nor send people I know there. Food good, service unacceptable. 2 1 
I noticed that the shopping carts seem to be smaller than other Fry's? Not a single person that worked there acknowledged me other than the check out lady who seemed very unhappy with her job. Won't be coming here again unless it's an emergency. 2 1 
The room was large and luxurious but I would rate it low due to the following reasons:They force you to pay a resort fee which is only disclosed after you book and provide your cc on their website. You cannot not pay even if you don't use the services offered.Secondly this place is not kid friendly at all, to get to the room one has to walk the whole    building. Also due to the free alcohol offered there are very rowdy people all around, we found a few on the elevator, that were using very filthy language and talking inappropriately for a public place. 2 1 
This place is like an old flame. You know why you swore to never go back but you end up returning because, while not good, it's also not totally horrible. The service is meh, the food is edible, and the prices are decent but there's really nothing that keeps me coming back except for the fact that it's close, so its got that going for it. 2 3 
I started going to LA Fitness a few years ago when they bought out Ballys.  The only reason I keep going there is because I have a low rate locked in.  I've been to 2 other locations in Pittsburgh (North Hills and East Liberty) and this is definitely my least favorite.  The equipment is nice and they will validate your parking in the garages--I can't really think of anything else positive.  The gym is packed with college age kids. I have no idea why they choose to pay $35 a month here instead of going to the free university gym.   The first floor smells OK.  Try to breathe through your mouth if you're on the 2nd floor in the summer.  The locker rooms are pretty dirty and usually packed.    If you're not comfortable around  crowds definitely stay away in peak hours.  LA Fitness corporate really pushes their sales people  to keep their gyms at maximum capacity.  They know how cheap Pittsburghers are so they will deal with it.   I also would advise some noise-canceling headphones because the music (Katy Perry, Bruno Mars, etc.) is really loud.  It's not a terrible place, but they do deserve all these bad reviews. 2 3 
I didn't know whether it would be fair to review THEhotel when they were ambushed by hordes of pre-teens attending back-to-back One Direction concerts. Being surrounded by "I love 1D" and "1D 4 Lyfe" shirts would be enough to drive anyone batty. So, I've tried my best to take these extenuating circumstances into account when thinking about my recent stay there.I hate to say that the first (bad) thing that hits you right as you step into the lobby is this...stench (which a previous reviewer delicately coined "STANK"). Now I know that a lot of Vegas hotels like to perfume their lobbies, but this took it to a whole other level. A friend summed it up best as "sewage mixed with cheap air freshener to cover the sewage". Another thing we encountered was a 1+ hour check-in line. Never have I had to deal with such a wait, anywhere - the line was at a standstill for most of the time. Now whether you work at a grocery store, a movie theatre, or a hotel, if you see a long line of customers growing steadily...wouldn't you call for reinforcements to help expedite? No? Maybe it's just me.The rooms were fine, and more spacious than what you get at a lot of other hotels. Each room has a separate bedroom and living area, a large washroom and a smaller powder room. However (and this may be the handiwork of the One Directioners), THEhotel was woefully understaffed and lacking supplies the weekend we were there. Not once were we able to get in touch with the front desk for anything. They also ran out of extra bedding, meaning the poor soul sleeping on the sofa had to use bathrobes and towels as blankets. One huge selling point of the Mandalay Bay / THEhotel complex is the huge pool area, complete with wave pool and lazy river. I suspect this is what gives it a much more "kid-friendly" vibe than other hotels, as there was very few adults-only areas available. That being said, I was happy to note that even on such a busy weekend, there were still empty chairs to be had and easy access to the bar, free water, and food. If given the choice, I definitely would not stay here again - unless I had kids. It wasn't the worst, but I'd rather stay at the Palazzo, Venetian, Wynn, or Encore any day, or Paris, MGM or Planet Hollywood for comparable pricing. 2 1 
Wow, one must seriously wonder why Britney Spears or Nicky Hilton or the likes of them would want to hang out here? Perhaps celebs get better treatment or perhaps this is a new spot? The space was not much of an expansion from the previous Ra Club although they changed the entrance walkway and we were certainly not wow'ed by the interior or the music. For a Thurs evening with a rather full crowd, the DJ was playing old Usher, Michael Jackson and Madonna's Like a Virgin. We were glad not to have to pay the cover charge since we had free passes, thank gawd! Certainly not impressed, perhaps it's better on Fridays or Saturdays but I would certainly check out Mix or Pure or Tryst which are supposedly some hotter clubs... 2 3 
Teriyaki chicken tasted like rubber. Water tasted like kerosene. Very expensive for a buffet..more expensive than Golden Corral.. and mostly seafood. 2 1 
I must say that I'm disappointed with Alexander Michael's. For the most part, each time I've dined there I've enjoyed the food. I'm a huge fan of the veggie burger and fries, and the prices are reasonable. The space is great, and I adore the 4th Ward neighborhood. In fact, I live there. That said, I've been consistently underwhelmed with the quality of service that Al Mike's delivers to its patrons. On a couple of occasions I've felt as though the server did not really care much about my dining experience. As an example, recently I went with a friend who explained to the server that she was gluten intolerant and order the GF pasta. Despite that, her pasta came with two slices of bread on top. To me, that seems like something that should have been considered, and if it was an honest mistake, that would have been ok. However, the server acted as though it was preposterous that she asked for another plate. She was extremely disrespectful despite the fact that my party was respectful towards her. I really want to like and enjoy this spot and I think the food is great, but the experience of eating out is 100 percent framed by your service and on a couple of occasions it's been subpar to horrible at Al Mike's. 2 3 
Never again.  I went to get a massage to relax- the place was so noisy- what with the reception radio coming thru the walls, a car idling below with hip hop coming thru the window and two ladies who worked there- talked in rapid-fire foreign language outside the door for up to 10 minutes at the top of their lungs- I know it wasn't urgent- cause they laughed in between their non stop talking- so it was pure discourtesy to be doing that outside a door of someone getting a massage.  The receptionist seemed like she never smiled in her life and the masseuse seemed bored and was either too hard or too soft.  Plus there was a heater in the room but she didn't turn it on so it was drafty.  The area of town was all high traffic and concrete and hard to read the number signs so I had to drive around a bit to find it- the oppositte of the relaxing treat I sought to find.  I don''t recommend. 2 1 
Well since my last visit I must say without Joe behind the service counter the place is changed for the worse Joe is a great guy to work with and it seems to me understands people's problems a lot more than the guys that are at buddy Stubbs service counter now. FYI Joe now works at Chester's Harley Davidson they will get my business. 2 5 
Scenery is very nice food not so nice ordered bacon wasnt fully cooked ordered toast wasnt toasted ordered sliced tomatoes w basil got a little cup with mostly juice and a few tomato cubes in a cup about 1 oz no basil and unseasoned eggs. maybe just an off day for the cook hopefully it will b bettet next time. 2 3 
Today was the first time i went there. The food was special. The crust of the crepe was crunchy, the dressing of the salad was too thick. The service was really disappointing. 2 3 
Four friends and myself ate at Alloy for my Birthday dinner last night and I must say I was not overly impressed. The decor is unique and the atmosphere was cool but that just does not make up for average food at an above average price. If it were not for the food I think I would give this place a 4! But in the end that is what tells the real story for me. We all tried a different starter, main and we shared a few salads so I can certainly say I gave it a fair chance. Service was friendly but did not seem overly knowledgeable, no food descriptions or desire created,Dish presentation was quite nice, Food was sub par, I kept expecting to be wowed by one of the 12 + dishes we ordered but in the end the candle burnt out and we were left with a hefty bill and disappointed taste buds. I may go back when the patio is open on a nice day to give it one more shot but that will be long after I try several other places on the bookmark list including some repeats to places like The Muse and Rouge where I would gladly spend my time and money :) 2 3 
highly disappointed....not by the quality of the food, but by the accuracy. i ordered spicy fried rice w/ chicken to go. how one would mistaken "noodles" for "fried rice" i have no idea, but for the price, i'd at least expect my order to be accurate. strike 1. fyi, i never give places a chance for strike 3. hope the next time they get my order right. 2 1 
very disappointing I ordered xlarge pizza for $10.99 I got a large 8 pieces is a large .greasy pizza ! won't go back. 2 1 
We purchased a groupon for dinner.  We got married there several years ago and felt it was a great way to revisit.  We were so disappointed!  The view was spectacular as well as the mansion but our food was mediocre for such a nice place.  We were sat by the wine closet and were interrupted numerous times.  Clearly there was available tables we could have otherwise dined at.  When our coffee came at the end of dinner it was cold and had been sitting for quite awhile.  We WON'T be back for the food. :( 2 1 
I was really excited to go here, as it has been hyped up time and time again by my friends.  This is why I am so shocked at how bad the food ended up being.  Something must have happened that has caused this place to go downhill.  Lobster pasta appetizer - This was very bland, very mediocre.  Not a terrible dish, but not what I would expect at this caliber of restaurant.Branzino - Fish with Chicken Pate and Baguette.  This was the weirdest dish I may have ever had.  The fish itself came out mostly whole and was dry and bland and not seasoned.  There was no sauce, yet it had a huge loaf of bread broken in half and laid on top of the fish.  Then, for no apparent reason, there was a scoop of dry chicken pate on the side.  Three dry items and no sauce, liquid, or flavoring.  Hands down the most disappointing dish ever ordered at what is supposed to be an upscale/modern restaurant.  Hanger Steak - The hanger steak itself was cooked a little more rare than the medium rare that we ordered, but no big deal.  It was a good cut of meat, but again very bland.  Could've used SOME salt.  There were some vegetables on the plate that were overcooked, under-seasoned, and uninspiring.  Desert - Chocolate cake with banana puree and ice cream.  This was a tiny little cake, just the right amount for a desert if you ask me, but was so boring that four people didn't even bother finishing the dish.All in all - I can't believe for a place with salt in the title, how under seasoned and bland everything was.   I am giving two stars for the atmosphere - it is a beautiful restaurant.  Given that the reviews have dropped off over time, I hope that the owners and staff can reclaim the magic that they'd once apparently had at this place.  I am holding out hope! 2 1 
Ordered two pizzas from here recently.  Not my taste, overly greasy and layered with salty garlic butter. I enjoy the simple taste of pizza and prefer not to have a layer of fat and salt overpower everything else. Crust also soft and droopy. 2 3 
I wanted to find a good place to do some work on a sunny Sunday afternoon and I hadn't intended on coming here because there was no free wifi. But, there was space and the menu was student-budget friendly.I only ordered a regular cup of coffee and a cheese scone. The scone was big but not particularly cheesy. The coffee wasn't particularly aromatic but you get refills for $1. They also have a special discount for students.But if you're not the kind of person who can work in noisy places, I suggest you go somewhere else. I'd recommend this place if you want a place for brunch. It was 4:00PM  in the afternoon and the place was packed with people still ordering eggs and toast. Cheap and lively, I see this place as being dependable but it's not the best cafe for studying.Apparently their cakes are to die for but, as a miserly student, I didn't have the stomach to dish out $6 for cake. 3 2 
Dined here for Restaurant Week, Spring 2017.Gigli - fresh pasta, but nothing special. There isn't anything wrong with simple, but the flavors in this dish did not really stand out. This seemed like fresh pasta with canned sauce.Mushroom 'Pasta' - the flavors did not settle into the mushrooms. Overall, bland.Tiramisu - solid flavorsSangria was too plain, martini was very strong (which was of course, absolutely fine).Veal meatballs were juicy, but were not very flavorfulOut of the whole experience, I enjoyed the polenta and tiramisu the most.Two star food experience, Five star service experience. 3 2 
We don't go to Koi often. But we know the sushi is safe and usually good. My only complaint is that they automatically add gratuity to everyone's tab. I don't know how they can legally do that. The service is ok. Sometimes you get a decent personable sushi chef, sometimes you don't. Sometimes you get a friendly server, sometimes you don't. We love their sushi tho... Spicy tuna, spicy philly roll, spider roll and some of the State named rolls. 3 4 
food was okay, but waaaaaay over priced!!!!!!! i like their fried chicken and pancakes, just wish they were a little bit cheaper! 3 2 
This was a pretty nice property. They did a great job with their interior landscaping and interior decorating.  rooms felt clean, sheets were crisp, white and clean.  Bed was fluffy with a pillow top.Did a late night check in at about 1am... the gal that checked us in looked like she was half asleep... very little conversation came out of her... so little that she never asked us if we wanted one king or two doubles!  checked into our room, and ended up with two doubles... we were so tired that we didn't even bother going back to the desk to change rooms... Valet parked the car, they allow you to call the valet desk to have your car pulled up to the front in 10-15min.  Pretty nice, no waiting needed. 3 4 
My cup of fish chowder was weird. There were little bits of stuff that seemed like chopped bits of meat, no idea what kind of fish. It was a flop. My Margherita flatbread was excellent. My wife's beef Stroganoff was ok. I was put off by the high wine prices and the lack of prices for beer and mixed drinks. 3 2 
I stumbled upon this place with my brother and his fiancee after a lengthy time at a studio without dinner. My stomach was ready for some action. And like any other Canadian, I love me some poutine. I'm not from Quebec but I've had poutine in Montreal. And as such, I consider myself to be quite the expert on poutine. Alright, not really but I'm not just reviewing this based on a comparison between Smoke's Poutinerie. We walked in welcomed by blasting music. It was almost like I was a captive terrorist in for questioning. Anyway, I ordered. It took several times for the person to hear my order. I almost took out paper and a black marker (or went postal on their sound system). Nonetheless, the order was taken and I was that much closer to "The Works". I get weak in the knees for any menu item that has bacon.Sat down on one of their tree stumps (I love the look of the place). But I was slightly underwhelmed. The cheese was, as all the cheese curd aficionados say, "squeaky".  Fries were great. The bacon was... bacon (in other words: perfection. I mean, if a place messes up something like bacon I think they should seriously rethink living). The gravy is what made this poutine sub-par for me. Well, maybe "sub-par" is pushing it, but it certainly isn't fantastic. I've had better poutine gravy at Toronto Pearson International Airport. Please don't hit me. Anyway, bottom line: it was good. Not fantastic, but I'd go there again. 3 4 
We came here during spring break, so it was crowded and we waited about 1/2 an hour. We got seated and our orders were promptly taken. The staff is super nice! They were smiley and friendly. But our food was just okay.My dad ordered a dish that was supposed to come with peppers and onions and a bunch of stuff (maybe a burrito or something, I can't remember). What he got was fine, but later that night he realized it definitely didn't include all that the menu had described. I had a "special order", I asked for just tortillas on the side, and chicken and onions. When I got my food I had tomatoes mixed in with my chicken and onions... it wasn't a big deal, they were small pieces, but still... I thought it would be easy since I'd specified. Besides that though, my food was lukewarm and the foil-wrapped tortillas weren't even hot. My mom's food just didn't show up at first. Apparently they had some issue in the kitchen or something... the waitress acted quickly and the food came a few minutes later, so the issue was resolved. The best part of the meal, in my opinion, was the warm tortilla chips they serve. Chips and salsa, yum yum! Overall though, the food was okay, some of it was warm, some of it wasn't... nothing special about it though. Just a good dinner. Average. 3 2 
Pretty solid burgers for late night snacks,but also killer breakfast.Eggs benny is the way to go.Lil' pricey but once you start eating you have zero f**** to give. 3 4 
We just saw Marmalade Skies play here last night.  We showed up early to grab one of the last tables. Fans of the band showed up in full-force. It was SRO early in their set. They sounded great ! The service, however, was below par. It seemed as if the place wasn't  prepared for the crowd that the band would bring in, even though the band played there about a month ago! We ended up waiting for the server to check on us more than once while we sat with water & drinks completely drained. If we hadn't been there specifically for the band, it's very likely we would have gone some where else. No condiments brought out for the sliders. No small plates brought out with the nachos deluxe which were nothing special. The sides of ranch we ordered didn't arrive either. The fries that came with the Real Deal Philly Rib Eye were soggy. Their Wings are the reason for 3 stars. I had the Honey Hot  wings grilled and they were DELICIOUS! 3 2 
Average food, especially for the higher prices. View was really nice, though. Wouldn't recommend to someone looking to eat on My. Washington though. 3 2 
Our server was on top of it, the food was good, and I liked the old timey ambiance of 40's music and black and white movies.  However, we waited an hour for our food with a 9 month pregnant woman and a toddler in our group and battled fruit flies from start to finish.  This would have been 5 stars without the wait and the flies. 3 4 
Knocking off two stars right off the bat:minus 1 star for the cheesy Venetian gondola rides/gondoliers/canals, blue sky fresco (sprinkler heads and all), human statue, and other assorted eye-rolling faux Venetian touches. Sure, I know that's why it's called The Venetian and it's all part of the sugary syrup that draws the huddled masses to Vegas...it's just not for me...I tend to lean towards authenticity. minus 1 star for mall stores like Banana Republic, Kenneth Cole, Brookstone, and Ann Taylor. I'm surprised I didn't see a Spencer's Gifts selling black light posters of St. Marks. I guess The Bellagio nabbed all the good high-end designers (Gucci, Armani, Chanel, Hermes, etc). The 2 stars go to their choice of celeb chef restaurants - Batali's B&B and recently opened Enoteca San Marco (with truly impressive wine lists)...Keller's Bouchon (same killer steak frites, breads & pastries)...David Burke...Puck's Postrio...and um, Chef Buddha's TAO (like the one in NYC, tasty and forgettable). And the last star goes to Breathe, an oxygen bar that did wonders for my hangover. 3 2 
A group of us went to this dinner show last weekend.  While it is not a Cirque Du Soleil show, it was a lot of fun.  The food was okay - it is not a gourmet meal - but it is fine considering the price also includes the show.  We enjoyed it. 3 4 
Located right outside Villa-Maria metro station, Quartier-Perse is a persian restaurant with many available seating. I was there on a Saturday night with ten friends celebrating. I was told by the organizer that she could not get a reservation because no one had answered the phone. Thus, she had to get there early so that we got a big table. When I first looked at the menu, I noticed that we only had two major selections: kebabs and stews. I ordered the lamb shank stew myself. We were first served sliced up pita bread with butter. Next, our lentil soup came. It was chunky with lentils, beans, barley, and spices. Even with this many ingredients, the soup itself was bland, but a bit of salt and pepper fixed it. Next, my lamb shank came.  I was first surprised as they served me the shank whole still on the bone separate from my rice. The lamb itself was fall off the bone tasty. The rice was cooked perfectly. The sauce, however, was again, slightly bland. I think the stew would have been improved by adding some vegetables to enhance the flavour, but perhasp that would no longer be an authentic persian dish. According to my friends, the kebabs were alright. To finish off the meal, they served us tea.Overall, portion size were large, and many of my friends did not finish their meal. However, I thought it was slightly pricey. If the food was just slightly better, maybe it would have warranted the price. Service overall was friendly, and we were so comfortable around them. 3 2 
I used to think they had the best tonkotsu ramen in Arizona but lately something changed. It's not as good as before. The soup tastes weaker and the meat is harder and tastes different. Also, miso soup should never come out by its self for Japanese food. 3 2 
As a pizza enthusiast, I was really looking forward to trying the trendy flavors this restaurant offers. Unfortunately, the pizza fell somewhat short in comparison to other pizza venues around town. Not only was the pizza a little pricy, but I felt as though it lacked the unique flavors described on the menu. On a different note, the service was absolutely wonderful. Our waiter was constantly checking up on us and even gave us free drinks when someone from outside accidentally threw a cigarette butt into my water glass. 3 2 
I've been to this location so often over the years they should name a seat after me. The food used to be good, now is just "okay". Same with the waitress staff.. at least as of 6 months ago. I got tired of the "old-bag" routine from a couple of them and haven't been back. (they sure showed me) I think there should be an age, or at least attitude limit.. seriously. Like the Beachwood location, they need to cut the old grumpy wood.Also, it'd be nice to see "healthier" breakfast alternatives. And no I don't mean Tofu and bean curd. Like organic eggs, real butter, decent fruit, avocado, etc.Place used to be "fun". Friendly (and kinda HOT) waitresses, decent (and HOT) food, nice location. Anymore it's just "blah". They need to go back to basics.And open the freaking blinds already! Egads let some light in that place. It's like they're vampires in there. Heck, maybe they ARE! 3 2 
this is the place i've been wanting to back in years! i remember coming here when i was a wee kid but never got the chance to go back. i have somewhat a vague memory of this place serving the BEST dry yellow/rice noodles with oyster sauce (i think in vietnamese it's called Mi/Hu Tieu Kho) excuse my bad spelling. So just the other day, i decided to head back and try it again and what i found out was that this is the ONLY place that serves up dry yellow AND rice noodles in the same bowl! Other vietnamese restaurants only give you the option of choosing one or the other. I ordered my noodles and when they arrived, i was very excited! Digging into the bowl was like digging into my childhood memory and it tasted great! Surprisingly, it was soo good that i was the first to finish eating. The soup on the other hand i wasn't able to finsh cause it was too saltly for my taste (as you can tell i'm not a big fan of salty foods 1. it can cause high blood pressure, 2. high sodium intake is not good for your health, 3. too much salt often covers up the taste of food)But going back to the point, i thought the food was delish! and i would have ordered another bowl but i was already full so i didnt. Probably nex time i'll order only the yellow noodles cause the rice noodles were a bit soft and soggy but the sauce was just right which i really enjoyed. atmosphere i would say is a bit dingy and may require some renovations but aside from that i thought it was great. 3 2 
honestly chef? I was expecting so much better!!! ok it's not a bad place of course, sitting in the famous Paris hotel and with Ramsay's hand motions made into a light... interesting idea. i ordered (of course) the famous beef wellington and husband ordered striplion steak, it was a big piece, he said it tasted pretty good.so the beef wellington, after watching and hearing it over and over on his shows, i was imagining someting that will blow me off the chair, but after the first bite, i thought "oh so this is what is like", and... that's it. well, the fillet migon was very nice, melts in my mouth, can you imagine a chunk of beef that melts? but the crust becomes soggy so fast so i didn't really enjoy the combination of some wet soft pastry and a piece of perfect steak.. we also ordered two appertizers, fried pork belly (1 piece) and yellowfin sashimi (2 pieces) and two drinks. bill came to $230 overall.would i go again? maybe when they bring scallop risotto to the main menu. ps. i think our server needs more training, he doesn't know how to make suggestions, maybe cuz everyone asks for beef wellington? 3 2 
The 0lace is located I  the palazzo hotel. Dim lighting and very romance atomsphere. The service is good. The steaks are not that good. Very dry and rough. I was shocked. The prices are I sane and for no reason. 3 2 
My husband and I were so looking forward to eating at this restaurant.  The service was excellent and the ambiance was very nice.   I ordered the risotto with scallops.  The  two scallops were delicious, however, the risotto was crunchy and undercooked.  In addition, the dinner portions were tiny!  They were more like appetizer sizes.  I was overall very disappointed with the meal and will not be returning. 3 2 
The employees here are really nice, and the food always tastes great. They've always had the items I wanted (usually chocolate frosted doughnuts and vanilla iced coffee). I also come in with coupons (usually from their surveys) quite a lot, and they've never had a problem putting in the discounts or anything.I'm taking away 1 star for their track-record with messing up my orders. I've only had a problem once or twice with my order when I'm in-person at the counter, and it was fixed really quickly (they forgot to give me my doughnuts once, and forgot the coffee another time). But almost every time I got through the drive-through (about once a week), they seem to have a really hard time getting my order right. For example, the last time I went through, the guy was 100% stoned, and he not only a) forgot the doughnuts, but also b) forgot the flavor pump *and* cream in my coffee. I caught the doughnut issue, but didn't realize how badly he had messed up my coffee until I had already driven away.I'm taking away the other star because the wait is sometimes quite long; even when I'm the only one in the store, I've had to start eating my doughnuts while waiting to pay  because they're looking for coffee ingredients or helping people in the drive-through. There's sometimes only one person working even in the mornings, which can make things go quite slow!Overall, the food here is good, but you have to be patient with the wait and prepared to tell them to fix your order. 3 4 
????sushi all-you-can-eat, fountain soda included 3 4 
I enjoyed it, I loved telling people I ate at LoLo's.  But it is Chicken, waffles, corn bread.  Not my favorites but a fun place to go! 3 4 
Average bowling place, nothing exciting. There is food but it's pretty pricey so I'd rather pass. The alley is big and there is a place for everyone to sit. Quick service and crowded enough that you know it's Not a terrible place. I'd definitely come back but when there is neon glow instead. It's $6 per person to play and show rental fee is $2.50 for adults and $2.00 for 16 and under. I'm not sure about the per person but my husband and 3 kids , 4 people all together paid $50+ dollars not including shoe rental. Not terrible but there is better places. Still a fun activity to do with the family and my kids and husband enjoyed it. I was at the Casino part which was a win win for all of us. 3 2 
Food is so good! Drinks are okay but don't hold up for the pricing. If you like a good burger come here. 3 4 
Fun experience. Very different for a thrill seeker like myself. I would give it a 5 star, but i didnt like the attitude that they gave us when they were trying to push on the sales.  It really throws out the good experience that i had for this place. 3 4 
My husband and son and I ate here for the first time this past weekend.  The atmosphere is much better than we expected--the whole feel is more upscale than many Asian restaurants, with plenty of authentic decorations.  The crab rangoons were among the best we've ever had.  The chicken satay appetizers were "OK"--other Thai places I've been serve more than just two skewers, but they were still pretty good.  Not as much flavor as they could have had.My son (age 10) really liked the grilled beef entree.  It came with noodles.  The meat was very tasty, but the noodles were thick and served cold--kind of like eating worms.  Not good, but maybe this is commonly done--we just didn't like that.  Many good veggies with it, though.My husband had the chicken pad thai and liked it--a generous serving.  Now, to my dish... I wanted to try pho since I'd never had it.  With my current cold/cough I was eager for a hot soup to soothe me.  Being adventurous, I tried the Pho Dac Biet (a combination pho.)  Big mistake!  It came with tendon and tripe--or "cow stomach" as I learned.  The odor from the broth even made it through my congestion.... I couldn't "stomach" it!  I picked around and tried to eat some noodles and greens, but kept scooping out chunks of bumpy stomach lining and tendons.  Not exactly appetizing, at least for me.  So BE CAREFUL!  I guess I was ignorant in my adventure, but I really wish I had tried the plain chicken pho.  The servers were excellent and very friendly.  I would try it again but would order something safer next time. 3 4 
This was a challenging rating. We were a tough group to handle, and they handled it with mixed success. I was at dinner with my family; a group of nine with three kids ranging from 3-10, a vegan, a vegetarian, and a meat eater. So finding a restaurant is no easy task. We made a reservation for 6:30pm, in hopes it would be early enough that the kids would not be too tired. Unfortunately, that wasn't necessarily the case, so we were not the most ideal family to be around. The wait staff were gracious, they were patient with the kids and were sure to bring out their food before ours. They even made a dish special order for one of the kids since there wasn't anything on the menu he wanted. They also offered a kids sized plate of mac and cheese rather than the full order. Unfortunately, other aspects were more of a disappointment.  After they brought out the kids meals, we had a good 20 min wait before the adult meals appeared. And one order was even later. The food was ok, but nothing that would entice me to necessarily return. The fish taco and the bruschetta were the highlights. And they were really good, the lobster mac and cheese was a bit underwhelming and the tilapia was overly salty. I really wanted to like this place, but in the end, it was just ok. 3 2 
PROS: Large selection of groceries, easy access.CONS: They 'forget' to bag groceries that you have paid for.  For multiple customers.  What the heck.  This seems to be a Indian grocery store disease.  Chor madarchods. 3 2 
I am loving the veg items! I wouldn't suggest the taco salad because you'll get a ton of the "flavor veggies" like onion in it and not much else interesting. This time around, I ordered the veg chalupa and cheese enchilada. Very tasty, nice portion sizes, and a great price. (Under $10 for late lunch!) I also love that black beans can be substituted for refried. My partner was able to get the sopas vegetarian and were tasty as well. It's not often that I have found carrots in med food and I like it. Our service was very slow this time. Perhaps because we were outside, I'm not sure if that factored in. Maybe due to the holiday staffing, but it was not packed at all. We had to ask for water after empty water glass being ignore on several server rounds. 3 4 
I want to really like this place. The car wash is pretty good for the membership price I signed up for. The free vacuums are awesome too. But I have been here 6 times and 3 of the times the tunnel has been down and I'm getting really annoyed. The first time the attendant came up and explained to me want was going on, and gave me a coupon. This time no one even came up to any of the 4 cars trying to figure out what was going on to explain why the lanes were blocked off. Hopefully they can figure it out. Maybe it's just been bad timing!! 3 2 
Went in with the family around 11:30 am on a Saturday.  There was no one in the dining area but when we left about an hour later the place was about half full.  Our server (Matt) was efficient and polite.  Ordered a side of mashed potatoes for my infant son.  They showed up a little too fast, as though they we sitting in a warmer waiting to be scooped out.  The wife ordered the angus burger minus the bun (she has a gluten intorerlance) with fries.  She enjoyed both though she thought the burger was just a little over done even though she asked for 'close to well done'.  I had the spinach, berries, goat cheese and chicken salad minus dressing.  It was very good though the chicken seemed a little sparse.  When it comes to chain restaurants, Houlihan's is average.  I will go back again when I'm at the mall. 3 4 
Went there for burger fest. Had the $50 burger it was pretty good undercooked yet a bit dry. Would say this burger would be worth about $35 at most. The host was a little off asking us what we were there for? Like come on lol. Where here for drinks and some dinner. The place felt a bit snotty. Don't think I would return. 3 2 
2.5, rounding up to 3 because this used to be one of my fav AYCE and hope that this one not so great experience was a one time thing.So first off, Matsuda used to rank in my top 5 AYCE Japanese restaurants. It was close to where I lived, food was slightly above average, and service was decent. Mind you, I usually go with my family of 4, so maybe service was slightly better than if it was a larger group. But I haven't been going for about a year now. Until my office decided to have our annual Xmas gathering at Matsuda. I called about a month ahead to make reservations, since we were going to be 15+ people. Being around Xmas, I knew they would be even busier, and wanted to make sure we got a table at the specific date and time that we wanted. So I called around the beginning of dinner service to make a reservation for a Tues around Xmas. A guy answers the phone, takes down my information, and than tries to hurriedly hang up on me. But I had a few questions about pricing and wanted to double check he got my information right, so I made him stay on the line. He than sounded super annoyed, simply just answering "yeah" to my questions, and than at the end saying "don't worry I've got you reservation, don't worry ok" with a bit of an attitude and than hung up on me. So flash forward to the day of our reservation. We had a different number of people than we originally reserved for so we called to let them know the change, and they couldn't find our reservation. Well apparently, we were lucky since we were eating slightly earlier at 6:30pm, slightly before the dinner rush, so they said they would find a table for us and made us a new reservation. I wonder what would have happened if we never called to make a change to our non-existent reservation, we would have been stuck waiting hours for a 15+ table.Anyways on to the food, based mostly on this experience only:~Sashimi & sushi were a-okay, maki rolls were not as fresh.~One of my fav items here that you probably can't find at every AYCE is the Fish Head Soup. Its a pretty big bowl with one half of a salmon fish head, tofu cubes, and lots of nappa cabbage. ~Cooked foods were mostly average, nothing super good or super bad, that was particularly memorable.          ~Particular hits with my co-workers, but not necessary myself, were the Unagi Rice, Matsuda Golden Shrimp, and the Grilled Salmon Heads. Those kept getting reordered.~Desserts were okay. There were a lot of Mousse options. Good for if you like tiny cups of different flavoured mousses.Service was super slow. I can't believe in this day and age, we had to order by dictating our orders to our one designated waiter. Most other places have ipads, or at least an ordering sheet you can fill out yourself. This kind of ordering method becomes especially annoying when you have a large group. A lot of our food items were missing, or it did not come in the correct quantity. It was hard tracking down our waiter, and when we asked him to check on the missing items, they still didn't come. Drinks were not included. Weeknight dinner was $24.99, which is pretty standard now. I don't think I'll be back anytime soon. But maybe someday I'll give them another shot for old times sake, but definitely not with a large group. 3 2 
Just finished eating here and it was okay...not impressed at all. It was a cute place but the waiter was unapproachable and seemed annoyed by us every time we asked him something (aka to get the menu again etc.). After reading the other reviews I was expecting amazing food and service but it was very average and not good customer service. Oh and the garlic rolls weren't that great either like others said. Wompssss!!! 3 2 
Nestled in between the galleries and boutiques at Gordon Square, Sweet Moses is a new treat bar. On a Saturday night after an opening at Wall Eye Gallery, the place was hopping. There was quite a wait in line and the place was packed with people until they closed.The sundaes are nothing short of artful. I've got pictures as well as a link to their menu on my blog: http://whatsincleveland.blogspot.com/2011/05/sweet-moses-soda-fountain-and-treat.html I'd call it pricey, but mostly worth it. Water came in glasses with crushed ice. Popcorn came for free to our table. It's romantic in an old-timey way.I couldn't help thinking that most of the proceeds from my six dollar sundae went towards the seamless branding and marketing this place has. This place would get more stars from me if:   - They had the structure to handle the high volume they're getting. The wait for a sundae is kind of ridiculous. But... they're new, so I have a feeling they couldn't have been expecting this kind of volume.- The prices were a little better... but, once again, the seamless brand experience doesn't come cheap.Things that made me happy: - They accept Discover - The pretzel and doily and popcorn - The crushed ice in the water 3 4 
Frequent the Tavern Grille for lunch from time to time. If I reviewed the place 6 months ago I would have given it a 4 for surprising me with a thoughtful menu and great service. Unfortunately, recent visits have served to taint my original impression, and I can only dole out a 3 a this point.Their beer selection is excellent, with a variety of local brews on tap along with a great selection of bottled beers. Local brews, especially IPAs, garner a star all on their own.Their menu has a huge variety of options, and many of them promise substance above and beyond your local bar food. Unfortunately, execution on the food tends to be so-so, much of what we've sampled being a little...bland. My reuben was average at best, and my wife's chili burger (order by mistake) was clearly topped with canned chili - a big no no in my book. I do have to say I enjoy their take on green chili cole slaw.The serving staff we've had have been cheerful, the waitresses definitely being a positive for the place. But the past two times our food has come out so late that it was the manager coming by with our food to apologize that we had to wait so long. Predictably, the food was cold both times.I was hoping we'd found a new go-to lunch place, but at this point, I think the search is still on. 3 4 
Have always loved this place, but the last visit could have been a lot better. The meat was over cooked and the service below par. The tres leches was to die for though! 3 2 
I went in today for Shellac. Called ahead and spoke with the owner who told me it was really slow so I could come on in. I live really close so it was a short walk. The lady who did my nails (I think she is the owner) was very kind and had an excellent rapport with her other customers. I could tell she had many regulars because she addressed them by their first name. I got black nails with my ring finger a different colour (sparkly gold). Overall it was a pleasant experience and I would go back but next time I won't get black. She was very careful but the black still ended up smudging a bit at the cuticle and bugs me a little bit. She did a hell of a lot better job then I could ever do with a dark colour so it's not the biggest issue for me. The shellac manicure was $30. Something to note; starting October to March they will be closed on Sundays for winter. 3 4 
The concept is actually pretty neat. I just don't really like the cupcakes that much. If you are a cupcake fan at any level, this place can be heaven. Maybe with a little time the selection will improve, but at a single moment there are only so many varieties. There were some creative ones but they were still semi-standard. Ex: add alcohol. I think they also have specials day to day which is a huge plus, but unfortunately I can't eat cupcakes every day.I personally would have liked to see a chocolate cupcake that looked like chocolate was a central component to the integrity of the cake. But heck that might be what separates cake from brownies. The cupcakes are worth ordering and when I went there were indeed an impressive number of cupcakes. Because this is a new place, I am sure they will appreciate regulars. You might also want to check to see if they will do custom cupcakes/cupcake orders, because that certainly could be a possibility. 3 2 
I haven't tried the rest of the food here, but the donuts are great! They have several different kinds of cronuts! A must try! 3 4 
I stayed at the Delta for 4 nights. The first night was terrible, the next 3 were fine. When I first arrived I noticed a piece of toilet paper left in the toilet, and when I flushed it overflowed. The water seeped into the carpet outside the bathroom. At this point I was almost late for my meeting, so notified the front desk and left. When I returned, the bathroom had been cleaned and an industrial fan put in the room to dry the carpet. There was no mention of moving me to a different room until I returned to the desk, voiced my displeasure, and asked to be moved. I was relocated to an 'upgraded' room at no cost. I'm not sure what these 'upgrades' were, but I suppose it was a bit bigger. At least it was clean. Like others have said, the TV was surprisingly small.What I like about this hotel was the location and price. Very close to where I needed to be and ideal for downtown shopping at the Eaton Centre etc. As well, I paid $68 Cdn on Hotwire and was happy with that. I will probably return if I have a meeting in the same location as it was a decent place overall and very convenient. 3 1 
It's funny, another yelper mentioned a great ambiance - but I guess it's not to my taste. I don't need silence when eating my ramen, but the music was way too loud. It's not really enjoyable when you server has to yell at you, and you have to yell back for them to hear you. To make matters worse, there was awkwardness at the communal table between the random couples (yes I've sat at communal tables before without issue). Thank goodness the food was better than I expected! If it was just based on food, I'd have given it 4/4.5 stars. 3 2 
I know you'd probably expect a better star rating but I'd have to say I  also expected more than I got. First of all, the food is good. It's really quite good. But not always excellent. The portions are copious but the presentation is non existant. It feels like you're on a farm almost. I can see how that's fun but in that case, it might be a little pricy for the farm experience. Second, service is good but it left me with the impression that the emphasis was on the upsell and not on the dining experience. If you go, I recommend the  second service, that way, you'll stay longer and enjoy the evening. Wine selection is good but not all the waiters are apt at suggesting the right bottle. All in all, it's definitely worth the visit and it probably it would have earned at least another star if not for the price or the impersonal experience. 3 2 
Great place....clean and modern.  Location is not the best.  Too close to the university.  Too much disruption. 3 4 
I've got to see it before it closed. It's a big part of MGM and what's makes them MGM. It crowded all the time. One of few things where parents can bring their kids to. It was free so nothing to complain about. It sucks that it had to close. 3 4 
Rock solid dinner for families in the Regent neighborhood. I like their margaritas a lot! 3 4 
The complimentary breakfast was basic but good and the room was clean.Watch your credit card charges.  We stayed for 2 days using points and so the total charge was $70.  But when the bill posted on the credit card, there were 5 additional charges totaling over $2400!!  I'm not sure how they messed up so badly. 3 2 
Food: we ordered Beef Sashimi, special Tuna sashimi, scallop sashimi, black cod, spare rib, bibimbap, i also got the original ramue drink. Total is about $65 including tax and tip.we liked the tuna and cod the most, i personally liked all EXCEPT the scallop sashimi. it got a 'unfresh seafood' taste.... Black cod was amazing!! loved the miso flavour twist. downside: we did see a hair in the tuna sashimi the 1st time and i asked the server to bring me another one...kinda gross :S but we were so hungry (after the 2 hours wait!!!!) so it didn't actually impact our appertize.I'm only giving a 3 star is because: 1. wait time is radiculous. 2. server was too busy to pay us any attention. 3. portion is honestly a bit small compare to the price...taste of food deserves a 4 though. 3 4 
This little noodle bar is perfect for Vegas.  It was all about the show.  Watching the chef stretch noodles by hand made me want to eat here.  The interior of the restaurant was really cool too.  The quality of the noodles was great.  However, when I order a pork belly noodle bowl for $20, I expect more than a single piece of pork belly the size of a domino in a scrambled egg whites in a soy sauce based sauce.  So disappointed. 3 2 
Some stores have great prices, others are absurdly, insanely, high. The food court is terrible. There is a highly entertaining place for the kids to play, including an interactive screen on the floor. Not much fun when there's too many kids though. And the enclosed play area is only for very small children. My kids were too big at age 3, which I think is highly absurd, especially since it's usually quite empty. 3 2 
A friend and I discovered this spot after trying unsuccessfully to secure reservations at several Distillery District restaurants. We were looking for a nice meal before attending a play at Soulpepper. The entrance to the restaurant is actually inside the entrance to a commercial building. Our wait staff was friendly and efficient. We shared a large roasted beet salad which easily could feed three and a zucchini pizza. Both were tasty although the beets were a tad on the mushy side and the pizza crust was somewhat soggy, not crisp. We also split a 1/2 bottle of wine. The washrooms are outside the restaurant itself and are available to anyone in the building in general. All in all a reasonably priced, good meal within an easy walking distance (10 minutes) of the theatre. 3 4 
3 1/2Good food and cocktail. But sometimes their food take too long to come out, waited almost 20 mins for the wings today :( but i love the happy hour, great price and good food. 3 4 
They have awesome beers and that is the best thing about this place. It is also a more relaxed option for eating in the area. The price-quality balance with the food is not the best. But it is mainly a busy pub. With the beers you can't go wrong. Have been here a couple of times and usually find my way back every now and then. 3 4 
Nice patio and deck.  Ok wine.  I was hoping for a wine tasting experience but it wasn't offered.   Expensive food.  I had planned to get a glass of wine and asked for a taste.  It was a little more than a sip - I ended up ordering the glass and was still charged for the tasting.   Only $.50 but still annoying. 3 2 
Great smoothie but super slow service. Seems they don't have good organization of who doing what? The cashier went back to the counter to make smoothie but no one attends the new customers, who ended up leaving. I wait probably 10 mins for a smoothie. 3 2 
Great old fashioned food except for the OWNER'S audacity to request a tip for his service.. Completely taken aback Makes you NOT want to return and kinda turns you off 3 2 
My mom and I wanted to do a girls pamper and chose this spa as it had a special groupon. They were unprepared for two people even though we'd made an appointment, and the cd skipped during our 'relaxing' time . The facial was ok, the wraps good, and the massage average. I'd choose another spa if you're really looking for elite treatment, although for basic upkeep, this one is worth a shot. 3 2 
I don't really know why but i expected to not quite enjoy Honey Bear's BBQ. Most of that is because when i think of BBQ anything i don't think of buying it more someone outside cooking it for me. Yet when i went in I can say I enjoyed. I ate the shredded chicken sandwich and was super happy with it. Though not a go to place if i get the craving I will pop back in again. 3 4 
I have visited the lunch buffet here at The Host a few times, it's great... for the price. Can you really complain about a $12 All-You-Can-Eat?You are not going to get the top of the line fine dining you may expect going our for a fancy dinner, but for a quick lunch buffet you really can't complain. I especially liked the chance to try ALL the items, then go back for more of what I enjoyed the most. I would definitely recommend The Host for the Indian Food Newbie (like me) who wants to try new things, but doesn't want to leave a plate full of something leftover that you didn't like.I also noticed some lack of interest from the wait staff, but in the end the overall experience was good enough to come back to. 3 4 
Pretty alright. We went in with a buy one get one coupon, and we might return if we had another. Ordered fish & chips, and a turkey burger. The fish & chips turned out nice, the turkey burger was not nice.Turkey burger's meat was spicy for some reason, and came with house-made thousand island which was also spicy for some reason. I don't mean an eye-wateringly powerful spice, or an interesting spice that added to the flavor profile, just an unadvertised "I wouldn't have ordered this had I known in advance" kind of spice. Beyond that, the flavors and textures didn't mesh or impress. And I'm sorry to not be sorry here, but I've grown tired of eleven dollar burgers that are so huge that you can't eat them without a knife and fork. I ended up taking half of this thing home, and then couldn't bring myself to eat it because it was so unimpressive.Otherwise, service was nice enough, and ambiance was okay (construction going on in another part of the building, so there was loud beeping and drilling that echoed around the open floor plan). The five-starry reviews around Yelp are speaking of their regular burgers, so maybe if we ever return we will split one of those between two people. Maybe with another coupon... 3 2 
I went to le bremner for my birthday back in december 2015 and I was disapointed with my experience. We told the waiter to surprise us all the way through and I will never do this again we weren't happy with their choices and felt that the dishes they served us really weren't their best dishes. The oysters were fantastic and the trout gravlax as well. We also had a buratta entree which was good but nothing to rave about. The main dish they served us was a whole fish with the spine and all and was not impressed. The other main was mushroom risotto which is usually my favorite but it was way too salty very hard to eat. Lasty was the pancakes for dessert which were very good. Overall my experience was not good enough to say id go back especially considering the price. 3 2 
French onion soup was watery with little taste.  We sent it back and were refunded the cost.  The wait staff also forgot that we were there for a birthday and didn't bring out a candle for dessert.  On the plus side my trout was wonderful and my wife enjoyed her scallops.  We've been a number of times but this last meal has tarnished that "must visit" image.  Pricing is reasonable for Vegas and reservations can usual be booked same day. 3 2 
I was excited to try this place based on the reviews.  We were greeted promptly and seated a few minutes later.  My first observation was how outrageously loud the music was.  The server basically had to lean in and yell to explain the menu.  Forget about any conversation with my girlfriend, we couldn't hear each other in the booth we were in.  The main course came out before the appetizer which was annoying.  Five small wings for $6 wasn't worth it.  I ordered the spicy chile wings and received the bbq wings, I didn't say anything since I torn on which type to get in the first place.  The only reason I would come back is to try the pretzel bites, which they ran out of.  Also the parking lot was large so you don't have to worry about finding a space.  2.5 stars for being disappointed, but I will round up to 3 for ambience of the brewery. I might come back for a beer, not food. 3 2 
Great food but I've gone 3 times in the past few weeks and they never have anything in stock. I tried to go yesterday but there was no rice left (white or brown), no chicken, and only 1 person working both food line and register. I'm going to give them another chance because I love the food but it's a bit ridiculous to never have any to serve. 3 2 
After reviewing Port City Club a few days ago based on an excellent lunch, I had dinner there with my wife on a busy Friday night.  Obviously the place is doing very well, because the restaurant was packed.  But, to accommodate its popularity they have lined tables up ridiculously close to one another.  We had tables on either side of us that were 14-15" away.  We were unable to carry on any kind of private conversation.  The waiters either reach over the person sitting with their back to the room, or squeeze between the tables with their butt hanging over the table.  I have never seen anyplace, even in New York City, put tables this close.  Maybe the crowd indicates that customers are willing to put up with this, but I am not.  I might try a weeknight to see if that is more comfortable, because the food is very good, but this was not a good experience. 3 2 
Four girls squeezed into a booth. Cue a "movie" waiter. My friend named our waiter as someone you would see in a comedy movie or sitcom--talkative, funny-ish, and always popping up at random times for small chat. Needless to say, our server was very attentive (e.g., good at recommending/not recommending dishes, clearing the table). He skated the *annoying* line very closely, never crossed it though so hurrah.Food got thumbs up from us: Med. pizza (really delicious and big for $9), Bison burger (fries were a hit), jambalaya, and dopple chop (it was good, but pricey at $20 for what is received). Drink-wise: Belgian pale ale (ugh, no. a bit of an off-taste), torched cherry caiprissima (too much lime juice for me, but my friend loved it), and don juan (nice). Overall, a good experience.  But not a place I would have cravings for or feel the need to re-visit. It felt like a safe night-out dinner. Plus you can wear what you'd like, I saw fashions of all kinds without much judgment. 3 4 
It is very cheap to eat there and the service is good, but the food is lacking. If you need a cheap place to go, this is the place. If you want quality Mexican food, go somewhere else. 3 2 
After reading reviews on Google and here on Yelp I wasn't looking forward to our visit to Central Psychiatry.  But I figured if I did not like it here, I would just get another referral from my sons doctor.  I took my son here about a month ago.  I signed in and checked the box that my son was a 1st time patient.  The girl at the front desk welcomed us. Our appointment was with Kristy Muir.  There was a lot of people in the waiting room and I was hearing from some of them that they were waiting for an hour or over an hour so I expected to wait at least an hour.  And we did.  After an hour they called my son back.  Kristy seemed professional and understanding and I feel that my son had good communication with her.  So our visit with her, I feel, went really well.  She gave us free samples of some meds that would last 30 days.So my sons follow up appointment with Kristy was last Wednesday, April 15th.  We were there on time and again the waiting room was really crowded this time around so I expected to wait at least an hour to an hour and a half.  I signed in, we sat down.  20 minutes later, Kristy called my son...AWESOME!  Only a 20 minute wait.  I had heard others saying they had been there for 2 hours already but they must have been waiting to see one of the other Doctors.  We were out of there in 40 mins.  So that day went really well.  Now today, I am trying to call their offices about the prescription my son received last Wednesday and I get a message saying "the number you are trying to reach is out of service".  So this sucks, because I really need to get a hold of them today.  So I will keep on trying.  Other than trying to contact them by phone, our overall experience was good. 3 4 
FOOD  above average  - Really enjoyed the seaweed omelette, broccoli shrimp, and octopus wasabi starter. SERVICE below average - they had enough staff just need better training on speed and attentiveness.AMBIANCE average - great noise level perfect for a date or equally a large group VALUE above average - like similar restos in this category good value.  $40 or less for food and drink per person.OVERALL - an average restaurant in the city.  If you are looking for something new, give it a try.  But we are on the fence on whether to give it a second go. 3 2 
It is too bad that my review will echo what the majority of others have experienced here. Quick to seat for sure but then it is like you are invisible. Food is so-so for a place that appears nice - decor is great but that is it. By far the best deal is lunch bufffet. I have absolutely given up on evening meals here. Potential is great but falls way short. 3 2 
Meh? I don't know, maybe I have had enough of this type of over the top food.  Service was friendly and attentive. The place was mostly empty around 6pm on a Friday. Nice outdoor deck.  Fried green tomatoes were pretty good.  Their namesake dish? It's some ok fried chicken on top of some ok waffles served with watered down maple syrup. Nothing life changing. The menu is more TGI Friday's than soul food.  Beware the "Drank".  Tastes like something you would give to a toddler in a sippy cup but it's got a kick.  I  ended up walking around Gilbert for 90 minutes to sober up after drinking one little 8oz glass of the stuff. 3 2 
I had mixed feelings about this place. My wife walked and it was packed, but we were seated right away. We noticed right away that it was really warm. Apparently the A/C was out which I know does happen so not totally knocking them on that. But we trying to escape the heat, so made it much more uncomfortable. I had a beer which was fine. My wife on the other hand tried a couple of their mixed drinks and they were awful. You couldn't taste any of the alcohol which made them super weak. For a $10 drink I would expect them to be much better. She tried two drinks and they were both disappointing. However, the food was really good. We tried the buffalo egg rolls and they were delicious. The dressing it came with was really tasty. We both tried different burgers and they were also good. The meat was perfectly cooked, but just too much bun. I ate half the burger and then just the other half without the bun. I am not a big guy, but I can usually grub. There was nothing wrong with the bun at all, but just be prepared for it. I probably would have been ok if we didn't have the appetizers, but I would take the egg rolls over the bun any day.For an $80 meal with drinks I thought it was just ok. Cooler tempature would have made the experience much more enjoyable. The right thing to do would have been to offer their customers some type of discount since we technically pay for the A/C and we didn't get any of it. However, we will never order any of their mixed drinks again. They seriously need to step that up.Overall this place looks like a cool place to watch a game. 3 2 
Ok, I have to admit that I didn't do -any- shopping here, so this review is strictly based on the artwork/decore/architecture throughout the mall. It's freakin awesome.My brother and I were walking through and he pointed to these colored columns standing in a pool of water and said he thought they were ice. I told him no way, how the heck would that work? Well, sure enough, we walked up to them and there was a metal pole running up through them keeping them frozen. Futher in, we walked by about 20 or so clear columns that had whirpools bobbing up and down, also very cool.Even the information center/guest services desk is very artistic, with a restaurant above that looks like a bird built it (sort of like a woven basket)...honestly, this review doesn't do it justice at all. Even if you don't plan on shopping, this place is worth stopping by just to walk through :) 4 1 
Stayed here for 4 days and 3 nights with my boyfriend, another couple and my friend's brother! So 5 people in a 2 bedroom suite. Loved it! Plenty of space for everyone. My boyfriend and I stayed in the master bedroom, it was very spacious and had a very big  bathroom with a nice tub for baths. The kitchenette was so great, we cooked several meals and made lots of drinks! The one thing they didn't have was dishwasher soap. The front desk was very friendly and helpful. Whenever we needed our trash picked up or more towels they brought them within minutes. We drove to Vegas from California and got to the hotel early, I requested and early check in and they were able to get us in 2 hours before check in. Also they provide shuttle service to and from the strip which was GREAT! Only reason I can't give it 5 stars is because one of the days while I was taking a shower the water got cold and stayed cold - never a good thing! 4 5 
Solid poutine, and the classic et cetera tasters is good for those looking to try different beers without having to commit to a full pint! 4 3 
Not sure why all the bad reviews are on here. Me and my wife went and had a great time. Got to the hotel at 1:00 and our room was ready. The lady who helped us was extremely helpful. The location and amenities were great. We relaxed by the pool and had a pleasant experience there too. The reason for four instead of five stars was the rude lady at the spa area. She could have been nicer about the gym situation. Basically she questioned whether we were guest but showed our guest keys. She looked us up in the system and we were guest but she questioned our resort fee? Finally she called someone and said it was a glitch in their system and let us in....without an apology. Overall it was a fun experience and are planning our next trip back to Vegas already. 4 3 
My favorite yogurt place. I like coming there on a warm day after a meal or just to grab something sweet and their variety is pretty great. If you are on a low fat diet, watching your sugar or none of that matters you will enjoy LULU's. 4 5 
We wanted to try a good crepe place in Arizona that was comparable to Crepevine in California, but I can't compare the two because the crepes here are totally different.Le chalet has a more french cafe atmosphere.  Service was a little slower pace compared to a chain restaurant, which was good.  We didn't feel rushed to quickly eat our food and get out.  We received a complimentary appetizer, which was very good.  We ordered a Croque Monsieur which could have been an entree for one of us that tasted a lot better than a regular ham and cheese sandwich.  The crepes had the right amount of cheese and meat none of which overwhelmed the whole crepe.  We ordered the Crepe Tatin which was a little heavy on the caramel, but still tasted good.  The apples were fresh, whipped cream was light, and the toasted almonds added a nice crunch. 4 3 
what I love about Costco is their great price, even on gas. This particular Costco is more toward business rather than the normal Costco, they do not have a photo center but do have printing/copying center. One other thing I keep forgetting whenever I come to Costco is that they don't not accept any other credit card beside amex. great place for wholesale and gas. 4 5 
I think Mundo is a great stop for Mexican food if you are in the area.  I've been there a number of times, the food, drinks and service are fine.  No complaints.  Would I make a special trip downtown to eat there?  Probably not.  If you are seeing a show at the Smith Center it is very convenient. 4 3 
Salty! I am not a person who puts a lot of salt on my food, but I do enjoy just the right amount, and a few of the tapas that I tried were a little too salty for me.  Despite the saltiness the tapas were good and the staff was friendly and attentive.  The restaurant itself was fun to hang out in, and the wine list did not disappoint. 4 3 
This shop is prime for college students looking for cheep costumes or themed party attire! The owner and employees are very sweet and helpful. I found designers bags and clothes for super cheap and in good condition. I would recommend anyone that is in need of a quick costume idea to check out this store. It is a bit small but since it just opened there are a lot of good things to pick from, you just have to look! 4 5 
Cafe Posada is one of Gilbert's best kept little secrets.  Its a great little restaurant you've probably driven by many times on the corner of Gilbert and Ray rd.   You've got to try the Carne Asada or the Pollo a la Parilla.  The never compromise on the fresh ingredients and you won't be disappointed.  Pleasantly Surprised! 4 5 
stopped in during the early evening hours the madness was starting to quiet down, I wasn't buying anything just comparing prices and for the most part it compares to Walmart or lower.  Reminds me of the old Mega Foods stores only on a higher scale.I will definately be back.I did see quite a few of the trailer park crowd there last night and that makes me nervous with all the bulk bins and the offspring running around 4 3 
Hotel motel holiday inn if ya girl starts acting up bring her friend! Lol.  Its a freemont hotel on the strip...... I enjoyed the bed, other then the luke warm shower thats all i used there. Big flat screen that we never turned on..... Check in was fast on a thursday friday line was going out the door though. Friendly older staff. Wife won around $100 on the slots. Would stay again. Cant beat the price. 4 3 
I have both eaten in and taken out with a positive experience. From walking by, it doesn't look like the greatest place, but they have an interesting menu with different asian/asian fusion dishes so there's a little bit for everyone from the exotic to the simple.The Malaysian Sate, which I had with beef, was delicious and came in a more than adequately sized portion. The Pad Thai is also a delicious meal. All of the appetizers and other dishes I tried were more than satisfactory. For a student on a budget, this place is both delicious and relatively inexpensive. I would recommend it to anyone who likes interesting tastes of Asia. 4 5 
Great drinks, prime location, and fantastic patio area. The bartenders are always incredibly friendly, and the drinks are usually pretty strong. I've tried the "Group Therapy," and it lives up to it's name--you need AT LEAST one other person for the drink. Not a place for dancing, but a great bar to hand out with a group of people. 4 5 
I just scrolled through previous reviews and read not so good reviews. I had the total opposite experience here.I got married on August 22, 2015 and decided to have our rehearsal dinner the day prior on August 21, 2015. We had been searching and "tasting" different restaurants on the strip being that many of wedding party were coming from out of state and we wanted to keep the dinner near their hotels. Our wedding reception was pretty formal, so after many taste testing ventures, we decided we wanted to hold our rehearsal dinner at a venue where everyone could mingle with eachother in a fun comfortable atmosphere.I remembered that we had taken my son to Senor Frogs for his 21st birthday. I contacted them by email inquiring about special events and I was immediately contacted by Denny. I requested to come into the restaurant after 5:00 PM to view the area of where we could hold our rehearsal dinner and he stated he would make himself available at any time. My husband and I visited that same night and knew the restaurant would be a perfect place for the atmosphere we were wanting! We held our rehearsal dinner for 30 people on August 21, 2015 and everything was set up as planned with food, tables, chairs, and was even accommodated when I had to add 6 extra people with the very little notice.  We chose to have dinner buffet style non-stop for 2 hours. Denny continuously checked on us to make sure everything was ok and our waitress Veronica (I think that as her name) was very patient with our large group! Thanks a bunch to these 2! :) The only complaint I have is the heat! lol We sat outside facing the strip, which was a beautiful view but hot, and although they provided misters and fans, we were sweating! August is a very hot month in Vegas, so I had I been a little bit smarter, I would've requested to be seated inside! I'm a local, so I should've known better! lol Overall, we all had a great time! :) 4 2 
Really like this place and became one of my favorite's after my first time, I really like that they don't charge for gauc and sour cream. Like the family business service. 4 5 
I love Salad King!  It was my go-to when I was at Ryerson and I will still go out of my way to go there now.  I don't care if it's not exactly 'real Thai', it is delicious!  I always get the spicy tofu or the golden tofu and I have never been dissapointed.  Staff are really friendly too. 4 5 
We went here for the oysters and were impressed. We ordered Shucker's Best Mixed Plate (12 oysters) and ended up getting 6 more because they were so good. We had a 1 year old and 9 year old and they both got mac and cheese (with bacon), which was delicious (lots of flavour). Our server was great too! Her beer recommendations were solid and she suggested a Shirley Temple for our son, which he loved! We will definitely be back, especially when we want oysters. 4 5 
My dad had emergency dental work that had to be done today. I made the appointment for him and the staff that worked there was very friendly.He is in his 50's and he told me that the dentist there was very good and one of the best he went to (he has really bad teeth so he has been with many dentists).It was a little pricey because it does have the 80 dollars examination fee. But considering the emergency and that it was on a Sunday, I think we came out satisfied. 4 5 
Great place for Korean fix. Gamjatang is to die for. 4 5 
I have been looking for a good Chinese restraint for lunch near work. This one fits the bill perfectly. 4 3 
This was my first time visiting Mucho Burrito, and based on that experience alone, I would be back.I've had my fair share of visits to Mexican-type, burrito chains (Burrito Boyz comes to mind), without much luck. Ya see, I'm not a fan of cilantro (aka coriander). I absolutely hate it. I will deal with it when necessary (usually in salsa is fine because it's always pre-made and it's very faint), but I cannot stand it when it's used as a garnish. This is why I tend to stray from Burrito Boyz because I'm pretty sure they cook their protein with cilantro. Gag.Mucho Burrito, however, does not. YAY! Boy, was I ever pleased. I ordered a chicken quesadilla, which came loaded with cheese, chicken, peppers and onions. I was mulling around the idea of getting a combo (chips and salsa), but glad I didn't because that thing was massive and came with a side of sour cream and salsa.It was delicious. And they even have a liquor license! I had a Corona with mine. Yum! 4 3 
Nice place, great service from the chef (he stand in every table explaining the details of the plates). Prices are ok. The oysters were very good. 4 3 
We stopped in here for dinner and cocktails on a Saturday night after friends we were traveling with got several referrals to check this place out. It's down the strip near the Riviera Casino. We walked into the lounge area as there was a wait for the diner side and decided we just had to hang out on the lounge side! The seating area is low back velour couches with little marble pedestal tables. There are neon lights and plastic flowers and mirrors! Oh the mirrors! Cue the 70's music!!!  The servers wear 70's style long black nightgowns and are very friendly. Ok food and drinks- we tried a few of the specialty drinks (green tea martini, oatmeal cookie martini with ice cream of course, espresso martini, White Russian). They make a solid drink here. We ordered a few appetizers- be warned they are enormous. Our little pedestal table was overwhelmed. The food on the lounge side was basic bar appetizer fate- but it's the atmosphere that wins here. There is a fire water table thing in the center of the lounge as well- very cool. Overall a very funky fun place to hang out. I will be adding it to my list of stops next trip.  Don't forget to break out your leisure suit! 4 3 
One visit suggests this is a strong addition to Montreal's boulangerie scene. The selection isn't vast, but it includes two pretty serious rye breads -- one 100% rye, the other 67%. I tried the latter and have at least one reason to return. Ace baker Julien Roy, formerly of Le pain dans les voiles, is part of the team. There are a few tables, and they also serve coffee. Bonne chance ! 4 3 
I was especially impressed with this restaurant! The food was great and fairly priced and the service was very attentive and friendly as well. I ordered chicken satimbocca with vegetables and it was delicious. The lemon chicken Greek soup was also a favorite. 4 5 
Love the vibe, ambiance, and flavors.  California comfort food done right.Great drink menu. It is so nice to feel at home and little details like the luchador masks and the repollo in the tacos make it all come together.  Minus one star for the smokers. 4 5 
Surprisingly good. Definitely better then the pho that was served by the previous owner. I ordered the assorted meats pho. The broth was very flavorful. The meatballs were cut in slices, which made eating it more convenient. I loved that they already had small dishes at the table to use to separate the hoisin sauce and Sirachi sauce for dipping my noodles :). I did not like that there was no option for a small pho vs large pho. One size fits all?  The special drink of the day was the tri color jelly. Too much ice for my liking. Maybe I was also too full to enjoy it. I would definitely come back for another bowl of pho! 4 3 
If you want a tasty meaty lunch,  the sandwiches are good.  It is so busy in the evening,  it's hard to get in. Barque Smokehouse is a good place to take friends to with its big Roncesvalles - facing windows. 4 3 
I reunited with two high school friends in Phoenix, Arizona last Spring! Thank goodness not in the extreme summer heat! The other girlfriend flew in from Maryland and we both met up with our friend who gave birth to a baby girl who now lives in Phoenix. Phoenix girl suggested dim sum and to go to this decent chinese restaurant across town. I was hesitant since coming from bay area, we have really good dim sum in the area but nevertheless Maryland girl was craving some chinese food hence dim sum was it. We arrived at 11am and secured a table for 3. As we started indulging in our food, we noticed the stream of people coming in....suprisingly the food was fresh, tasty and decently priced. It was a memorable reunion nonetheless. :) 4 5 
An interesting mix if Indian and Nepalese food.  It's a small place in a strip mall but worth trying.  The service is friendly and we met one of the owners (or managers?) who was from the Bay Area and chatted about Indian restaurants back home.  Tikka Masala and Butter chicken are tasty but not at the level of my favorite in SF (Mehfil).  Best I've had in Vegas so far. 4 3 
d) we had better wine at home for 1/3 the price :-) 4 2 
I generally eat here 2-3 times a week. By far the best place in Brookpark to get breakfast. Hearty, fresh portions at good prices with good service. I usually go with the western omelet, but they have very good french toast as well. Their hash browns are awesome. They are pan fried red potatoes. You could say I'm a fan. 4 5 
Great crepes and overall quality. The prices are too high, but hey that Vegas. Good for a group of four but not more than that. 4 3 
I'm a student doing a summer internship downtown so I booked this place for the 12 weeks. They offered me a great deal for the long term stay, it was discounted due to the length of my stay. I read the reviews, but still decided to book. The outside is nice looking, but then again, it looks like a hotel. The reception area wasn't spectacular, but I didn't expect much after the price I was quoted. The hallway carpet has stains, but so does the Biltmore. I was given a 2nd floor room, but requested first floor since I would be leaving early in the morning to work and staying awhile. They had no issue with having me look at a couple available first floor rooms and choose one. The rooms were impressive actually. The stove, sink, full fridge, and bathrooms were very nicely set up and in good shape. The bed isn't the most comfortable, but definitely not a deal breaker. There is a HD flat screen TV with free cable, and also free internet available. I've been here a week so far and I am very happy I stayed with this choice. The pool, although I have not been in it, looks nice and I see somebody cleaning it every morning. 4 3 
It took a couple tries for me to warm up to Carmon's. Spouse got it quicker, and finally convinced me to go back. I did and have returned again and again. It has become one of the go-to places for Spouse and I.What was different? For starters, I came for dinner. That's important, I think. Carmon's has a distinct French bistro vibe that really shines at dinner but doesn't at lunch. Lunches can feel...odd. A little precious. A little cold. But at dinner, with a stemless glass of delicious red wine, lower lights, darkness outside, the preciousness becomes cozy while the cool allows for privacy that spurs conversation (it helps immeasurably that this is a restaurant where you can actually hear and don't need to shout to be heard across the table.) Second, I branched out from crepes. The fish specials here are uniformly good - never dry, never over-fussed, never over-salted or otherwise over-seasoned. They're fresh, simple, perfectly cooked - extremely hard to do for most restaurants. The fish is usually served over pommes frites that, again, are well-executed: simple, straight, delicious.  We've since had other specials here, too -all of which are straight outta bistro. And good. I haven't left crepes behind, mind. The Nutella crepe is a wonder of richness that must be ordered at least once (and then good luck not ordering it again.) It can't be entirely explained by either the crepe or the nutella. It is more than the sum of its parts - which, I guess, applies to Carmon's itself. I still don't go here for lunch, tho. 4 3 
I dropped by Madison's for a late dinner before going out this past week.  The restaurant was split into two sections - one with a traditional bar feel (much louder and starting to get busier as the evening progressed) and the other with more of a traditional restaurant feel to it.  I choose to sit on the quieter, restaurant half.The service was good - attentive and friendly.  They had a good beer selection including my favorite - Bells, so no complaints on that front.  For dinner I ordered the turkey pesto sandwich and my friend got the mac and cheese.  We both ordered sweet potato tots.  The food was better than expected given some of the prior reviews I had read and the tots were excellent.  I love pesto and melted goat cheese added the perfect touch.  The mac and cheese - made with local Hook's cheese -  was also very good. 4 3 
Came on a Saturday for lunch before going to the Lion King.  Got in right after a large group on the patio outside and before another large group was arriving.  Probably 1 of only 2 parties eaching inside (2-4 people).  Place was pretty empty.Service was good.  Bread/crackers good.  Water stayed full.  We ordered a burger, an asian chicken dish (good, but nothing too special), bbq chicken pita (decent, with homemade potato chips, again, nothing special), and crab cakes (appetizer, came with 5 about the size of golf balls, again, decent).  I had the burger and it was quite tasty.  Came with cheese (said gouda but I got cheddar, without knowing it), (awesome) bacon, tomato (salsa-like, nice touch), and a garlic aeole (couldn't taste).  Very tasty burger- would definitely get this again.  Got a really nice side of fruit with berries and mango.Menu is mostly sandwiches/burgers, with a couple of asian dishes and some salads.  Kind of random I thought.  Great spot for a quite, though slightly spendy, lunch outing.  Total was around $70 (tip included) for the above mentioned items. 4 3 
One of our favourite places to order from when we are feeling lazy. We usually get the jerk chicken and the roti because they are so good!! Not only is the food delicious, the delivery is always quick and courteous. 4 5 
pros:love the bang bang shirmp!I love the mango salsa sauce on grilled fish. service was good.cons:the quantity is small. 4 3 
This place consistently has good deals on seasonal fruits and veggies. Pay for your fruits quickly at the fruit cashier in the north upper corner of the store, and everything else (including fruit) in their proper downstairs cash area if you are shopping for a bigger variety of food. They got everything - lots of seafood in the back centre aisle, meats in the back corner, vegetables on the left side (recently reorganized - much fresher space) and everything in between in the middle aisles. With the price of dried goods and other shelf stable stuff par for the area, I never go to Chinatown without going to this store. I don't want to miss a deal! 4 3 
I ordered online for pick up and it was ready before i arrived 13 minutes later.  That's great considering I've waited almost 30 minutes in drive thru at a fast food resturant before having to be to work. I ordered a complete meal for my fiance and i, & it was very good. The only reason i am not giving a 5 star is because the woman i dealt with when i ordered an extra pastry upon my arrival, was very ride,  & seemed irritated with the fact that i wanted more food. . In turn spending more money. But whatever. My steak & cheese panini was amazing, along with my chicken & rice soup. Of course i got a blueberry muffin as well. 4 3 
First time and it's very delicious the service is nice and the overall theme reminds me of the old days 4 5 
I get take-out 3x a week as I work close by - it's so fresh and healthy (they even offer low fat sour cream).    I've tried every burrito place in the downtown core and this is my favorite as it's always fresh and fast.    Line ups are long but move fast ....longer wait for the burritos but super fast if you get an inside-out burrito (no fajita) or a salad (same but with more lettuce and dressing on side) 4 5 
Every time we went in there weren't many people; which was fine for us. You seat yourself and your server will usually come quickly. Nice and clean from what we could see. Friendly staff. Some of the bread was a little hard, but it wasn't the end of the world. We still ate it. We liked the environment so we will likely be back. 4 3 
Had the shrimp cocktail inside the coconut with a Mexican coke. Comes with a side of saltine crackers & some super hot chili sauce- waitress warned me that though delicious one should be cautious with it. It comes with a good amount of shrimp which tasted as fresh as it can get in Arizona. My total bill was about $22. On another note, the restaurant has an old jukebox with a good selection of Mexican music. Don't be shy about asking for the volume to be turned up as the jukebox is somewhat hidden in another room & it's hard to hear. In addition they have a small garden in the back that I love to sit in as it reminds me of my grandma in Mexico. 4 3 
Man, this place is the bomb. The fact that it exists in Solon and not one of the other 'burbs makes it even better, as that town's ample workforce can definitely use a good healthy lunchtime alternative to the droves of chain restaurants that line Routes 43 and 91. The restaurant occupies a small spot in the Giant Eagle plaza and is surrounded by several storefronts that at the time of this writing are unoccupied. People of Solon: SUPPORT THIS PLACE! It's family-owned and the sweet ladies that work the place will remind you of your one Eastern European aunt that derives bizarre amounts of pleasure from watching you stuff your soup hole with spoonful after spoonful of steaming hot goodness.The homemade soups rotate in and out seasonally and are divided into hearty and lighter sections on the menu. They also have tons of veggie and gluten-free options. These soups are WAY better than the ones found at the Zoup! down the street. The wraps and sandwiches are pretty good as well, though not as outstanding as the soups. C'mon, what are you waiting for?! Get off your duff already! 4 5 
We saw the Food Network's Diners, Dives, and Drive-Ins when my parents were in town.  So, we decided to try it out but went to the Scottsdale location because it was closer than the Phoenix location.  It was on Bell Road right next to the Ice Den.  I guess normally there is a 30 min wait but we got seated right away.  I ordered Omelette #4 (spinach  with tomato, garlic and feta cheese).  It was DELICIOUS!     My mom had the blueberry pancakes and really enjoyed them.  Prices are a little high ($3 for 3 pieces of bacon), but all in all, I thought the food was tasted very good and was filling.  I would definitely go back. 4 3 
Decent prices, authentic food, SPICYWhatever spice lvl you're used to getting, go down about 2-3. I thought I was manly and got a lvl 8 pad-see-ew... was literally tearing, my friend had a good laugh. It depends on the dish though as my friends chicken was fine (also an 8). Definitely recommend if your into Thai food 4 3 
After a recent SHITE trip to Streets of New York (which is the most accurate way of describing how their pizza tastes) I really need to vouch for this Domino's. As noted before, they are always fast and friendly. They have the nicest delivery drivers. Unlike Streets. Domino's has never made me sick either. 5 4 
The only pizza place we order from in the south of Calgary! Sure delivery takes an hour in peak time but we only order on weekends so we expect it and plan for it. Busy is a good sign that they serve good food! Drivers are always polite, the food is great and exactly what you order is exactly what shows up. Oh yeah, and they don't skimp on FRESH toppings. Keep up the good work. 5 4 
Excellent place with good food, fast service and plenty of screens to watch the game. Prices are affordable and the service was prompt and courteous. 5 4 
Great food and people running it.  I highly recommend the vermicelli bowls as they are like nothing I've found elsewhere. Unfortunately I've moved from the area but whenever I'm back I always try to stop back.  Again: get a Vermicelli bowl. 5 4 
As someone who is debatably the most unathletic individual on the east side of Madison, I was thoroughly impressed with how much fun I had at Keva sports. They have a variety of courts, are a great place to check out if you are interested in joining some sort of sports league, and have beer specials almost everyday of the week. 5 4 
It's an Europian coffee shop where u can sit outside and enjoy your drink.They make good machiato(my husband loves it),delicious and healthy smoothies.I love that ginger peach hot tea..We go there almost 3 times a week.But know that my hus is in vacation we will come often.We take his parents too,cause as Europian we like these kind of places.I forgot to mention it,you don't forget to try the gelato,especially the chocolate one... 5 4 
Just returned from a weekend getaway with the girlfriends and i must say i was impressed. the hotel is beautiful, rooms are clean and very large with a nice living room added and a bathroom full of mirrors for those selfie enthusiasts! :) but as a new mom who was trying to keep her milk supply, the most impressive part of this hotel had to be the staff. We were leaving sunday night at 11 PM so we had a full 12 hours from check out to leaving Las Vegas. My pump is pretty heavy and bulky so i had to leave it in the large baggage that they stored for us. When i had to pump in the middle of those 12 hours, i went to front desk and asked if they have a small deposit room where i could pump more privately. They've immediately got my old room ready and told me i can stay for as long as i need to do my motherly stuff. I was quite impressed with this as Vegas is a party town and i didn't think they would be so open and friendly about the entire situation. So grateful to those wonderful ladies at the front desk for helping me out! 5 4 
- If you haven't eaten at The Lakeview, I'd suggest you do.It's quickly become one of my favorite places to go when I'm craving diner food, but want to stay away from the typical greasy spoon diner type-of-place. The Lakeview is open 24 hours-a-day, and that definitely contributes to one of the cool aspects of this place: it isn't that you can eat imaginative diner-esque food at 3 o'clock in the morning on a Tuesday, but also thatyou can eat it at 3 o'clock in the afternoon on aSunday and the experience is entirely different.That's because it's inconsistent, but not in a bad way. It's inconsistent because of the diverse group of peeps you can expect to see there when you go: Sunday afternoon is the brunch crowd, Saturday evening is the daters, Friday late-night is the Ossignton bar crowd. Whenever you go, it's a different sorta experience.It's not just diversity that makes this a kick-ass experience, the food is also spectacular and truly imaginative. The style of upscale-diner definitely comes through on their menu withitems like theCorriander Walnut Pesto Omelette, a Peameal Brie and Havarti Cristo-style sandwich, and the Lakeface Albacore Tuna Melt. It's a genuinely nice blend of the expected and the unexpected. As a side note, I need to mention the impressive veggie burger they've got that's made from black beans and served with a wild mushroom saute and caramelized onions. Spectacular. Whether it's their 24-hour menu or their brunch menu, vegetarian or carnivore items, this place cranks out some delicious food.I'd definitely recommend you check out The Lakeview. They're doing diner food right, 24 hours-a-day. 5 4 
So my boyfriend and I came here for my birthday ; I have been wanted to try this place since it has opened big fan of Gordon watch him in Hell's Kitchen so I couldn't imagine so where better to celebrate my birthday. Daisy was my server she is so sweet knows the menu very well and suggested great items I didn't even really have to look at the menu I had some fruity cocktail it was very refreshing and her server asst. helped by cleaning items off table and refilling our waters. I got the ribeye medium it was so good ! I ate all it's served with potatoes and my boyfriend had the chicken pot pie chicken was very juicy and gravy was top notch! She suggested the sticky toffee to top it all off it's the best dessert I have ever had I still dream about it served with a vanilla ice cream. I will be back !!!! Thank you daisy for making my birthday special 5 4 
Great food, great coffee. We had a grilled veggie panini and banana zucchini chocolate chip muffin with macchiato. 5 4 
Great Mexican place in downtown Madison just off State Street. This place strikes you as very authentic (perhaps it was something about the luchador fights on TV in the restaurant with the Spanish commentary).Food was awesome. Had tostadas and gorditas which were both fantastic (chorizo, steak, pastor (pork) - can't go wrong!). You can buy individual tostadas or gorditas for $3.50/$3 each though there are lots more options. Also had this amazing drink that was like milk with cinnamon toast crunch flavoring. Definitely check that out. 5 4 
I've worked for several vet clinics over the years in 3 different states so when I go into a clinic with my own dogs now that I no longer work for a vet I have a list of criteria Im always "hoping" is achieved.1. Cleanliness - my first impression is that they actually look the time and effort to fully decorate the facility and have managed to maintain the aesthetics dispite urine and feces daily, im sure. I noticed clever and cool details like paw prints in the ceiling tiles as well as the decals for the exam rooms and candy for the owners.Professionalism - from my initial phone call to reception to the vet and checkout, you guys rocked it.Knowledge - dr. Zimmerman is awesome, she knows her stuff and I appreciated the fact that she didn't insult my medical intelligence. She also followed thru with calling me with test results, something I have found rare in Vegas.I really appreciated that no one was afraid of my dogs breed or that we were treated like thugs because of it.The prices are competitive and I have found my new vet clinic, thank god!Keep up the great work!Thanks so much,Love Glass, Glynis, Starla and Zero Roades 5 3 
This place is eggcellent (sorry had to do it)    seriously though, check this place out. Great food and good breakfast atmosphere. There are a ton of good choices, and the owner cares and is personally involved. 5 4 
I've eaten at Bad Daddy's a couple times. Always a great atmosphere, great burgers and salads, and good service. Gotta try their Ghirardelli chocolate and peanut butter milkshakes!! 5 4 
A hidden gem. Very nice amenities and reasonably priced. I definitely recommend this place for some good old R&R! 5 4 
Great food with great price. You won't feel you are paying premium for vegetarian food 5 4 
This is the old fashion hardware store on steroids. They have tons of virtually every hardware item in open Bins and with the very knowledgeable, helpful staff. I look here for stuff I can't find at Home Depot. 5 4 
Just by chance I passed by the studio and saw the ad for the 'Hip hop hustle' workshop.  Four sundays in June for $40--never mind that I live an hour away, never mind I'd be out of town for one of those sundays...I. Wanted. To. Live. My. Dream.  Yes, it's a save the last dance/step up kind of dream but dreams are quirky.  You want what you want.I told this all to the husband, he quickly agreed-not because he really wants me to achieve my dream-he didn't mind spending a day in Madison every week.  The dance space is nice, a bit over the top pink but there was a respectable mirror ball.  My instructor, Jeanne, was friendly and, more importantly, helpful.  The first 15 minutes was a little warm up, learning some pretty easy choreography and then the majority of the class was learning a longer hip hop piece.  We learned a chunk every week and put it together at the end.  I felt pretty accomplished by the end of the lessons and wanted to continue the dream...The studio offers lots of different lessons, even a thriller workshop or a britney spears set of classes, and---my next dream: west  african dance.  I had been to Mali and there is really nothing to compare dancing with live drums; you are alive and you are joyful.I either wish I lived closer or they moved here...but moving to beloit? or janesville? hehee....highly unlikely.  I could probably fit a couple more classes but once summer is over, I'll have to put the dream away. 5 2 
So I have been burned by yelp reviews before, but this time they sent me to a delicious food truck! The jerk  chicken was decadent. If you have a low tolerance for spicy, however, probably stick with the beef patty. I promise it tastes WAY better than it looks. We also got the jerk chicken burrito special, which was all the flavors at once. Highly recommend! 5 4 
I love rebar, there are tons of friendly people here-I almost always make new friends when I come. The drinks are always flowing, and the food is always good! My favorite dishes are the black bean burger, the jicama that comes with the wings, and the grits and shrimp. Definitely a good place for vodka mixers-less options when it comes to wine. 5 4 
I thought my shoes had the biscuit when my puppy chewed them. This shop made the best of a bad situation and I am thoroughly impressed by their work and will return, hopefully for other reasons. 5 4 
I love Terriaco's and I have been going there for years.  There is a big difference in having alterations done at Terriaco's versus a seamstress.  These guys are pros.  They could look at you and know exactly what clothes you should wear.  Domenic and Frank know a lot about clothing and how it is made, and how you should wear your clothes.  I have worked with both Domenic and Frank and both are very honest which I LOVE, but I guess if you are overly sensitive you could get offended.  Personally I like to get someone's opinion...especially a man's opinion on what looks good.  This is the place to go if you want something to wear for a special occasion!!  The clothes at Terriaco's are beautiful, and fit better than dept. store clothes. 5 4 
My husband and I were looking for a fine dining experience - a night away from our toddlers. We took a chance with Firebirds as we had never been. We started the night with the lobster spinach queso, which was amazing with the fresh bread (in lieu of the chips) served prior to the entree (as suggested by our amazing waiter, Sam). He was funny and gave us a great feedback about the dishes and wine. We ordered the slow roasted ribeye, which was perfectly cooked - definitely try it. We also enjoyed the spiced pecan green beans and lobster tail. We ended the night with a warm brownie (it's large and my husband and I shared). The prices were fair and honestly we felt we received a LOT of bang for our buck. Even after leaving a 20% tip, our bill was surprisingly affordable. We loved the high end feel of the restaurant while it was perfectly acceptable to wear jeans. It is casual without pretention. Loved it all! 5 4 
I had my big olde english sheepdog groomed here and they did a fine job and the price was on par with everyone else. Actually I think the price is about $10 more, but I'll pay the extra money because of the extra service this place provides.I really appreciate that they have a pet taxi, bc of this service my dog gets a ride home for free (but we did tip the driver). Since I have a little child it's hard for me to bring my dog and pick him up on the days I would have time to pick him up, so the taxi is worth it for me. Bc of this service I can now drop off my dog before I go to work and my husband (on days he's caring for my daughter) can be home to let my dog inside. This is easier for me than having to bring my 100+ dog inside while holding my baby.Shauna's is right next to Mountainside Fitness, it's right in Surprise so if you live in Surprise this place will be easy to get to. I also thought the service was great too. I'll definitely be taking my dog back here the next time he needs to get groomed. 5 4 
Stopped in while my boyfriend & I were on our way to Cathedral Gorge. With all the driving we were desperate for a good beer. Friendly staff & we loved the Hop Ride American IOA. We are from San Diego so we basically live off IPA's. Awesome addition of going upstairs and checking out the beer vats and where they brew from the glass wall. Well worth a stop on our drive :)BONUS: We loved all the chalk art. 5 4 
I haven't been here in awhile but I do remember I would get my Chocomaina body scrub and butter here. It was the 3 for 33 deal, absolutely love The Body Shop products my other fav was their perfume mist and the Scent Love Ect. The customer service was great too Joel helped me pick out everything. 5 4 
First time eating authentic Cuban food. We will be coming back for sure next time in Vegas. Try the tasting plate which has three meats, salad, platanos and black beans and rice.  My wife had the Cubano sandwhich with pork. My son had the pollo y arroz. The portions are large for my gordo friends like Juan V.and Trevor T. 5 4 
This place might be a reason for me to move to Montreal. It absolutely beautiful even on a rainy day. It really merges the European and the diverse Canadian culture into one. I love how everything feels very authentic from the architecture down to the cobblestones you walk on. Came here everyday during my weekend stay in Montreal but I would definitely spend a full week just roaming around the port and maybe one day taking a cruise down the river! 5 4 
Stopped by earlier today because my car desperately needed to be cleaned. I pulled up and a nice girl named Kat helped me pick out what kind of car wash I wanted. They have lots of different things you can do so it's important you understand what comes with each wash, since they're all different types of cleanings . I ended up getting the VIP car wash and added the carpet cleaning. They were doing a promotion at the time so I got $10 off the carpet cleaning and since I had recently gotten my oil changed next door at jiffy lube I also got half off the car wash. So this $54ish wash only cost me around $30. Which was great for me. It took them about 2 hours to finish my car... but like I said it desperately needed a cleaning so I figured it would take longer then normal to clean it up. The cleaning looked great, and the best part for me was watching the detailer, Kayce I think his name was, RUN to get a towel and finish up my car. The hustle really impressed me because I've seen a lot of other  car places where the people are very lackadaisical. So I could tell he worked his butt off cleaning my car. All in all I was very impressed with their service, the people in the store were very nice and helpful, and my car looked great! Cleaner than I had seen it in awhile. I definitely will go back for my next car wash! 5 4 
The girl with the long hair always helps me out in the morning. I get either a Vegas sumo or a build your own bowl with salmon, and she always makes sure to pay special attention that she doesn't touch any of my food with shellfish items (I have a food allergy). Poukei rocks, thanks guys! :) 5 4 
Great service . Courtney was lovely and cute :) will return for the steak and Mac cheese . 5 4 
I'm new to the city and finally took the plunge to committing to a new hairdresser. I also saw they did nails and was wanting to treat myself. So I booked both on the same day, one after the other. Booked the hair appointment online which was confirmed via email and I replied adding on the manicure. No problem. Effortless. Nails: I'm quite new to having manicures. Last time I went somewhere which was rated 4 star on Yelp and it was ok. But here was miles better. Good customer service. Had little chats now and then. The nails were prepares nicely, and my torn nail repairs perfectly! The drying process well executed. Polished and finished really well too. Lovely shiny nails that I'm getting many compliments on already and I only had them done this afternoon! It feels like excellent quality and have full confidence this will last (better than the other place's manicure). Also I was told to call up if I had any problems or mishaps with them! Great service!Hair: I had Franca I believe. She asked what I wanted, and she full understood. She even suggested an extra touch just to help my fine hair not look so flat. My hair looks just how I wanted it. Spot on! On top of all this the prices are great! Value for money! Will be using as a regular. 5 3 
This place is fantastic for Sonora style fried fish and shrimp tacos. The toppings bar is awesome for making your tacos the way you want, and the staff is very friendly. My only knock would be the ventilation isn't amazing and it is a smaller space, so it can get a little stuffy and you'll leave with a full belly but clothes that smell like fried fish. 5 4 
My most favourite Italian restuarant in the Vaughan area - and this area is full of Italian restaurant.  This is definitely not a typical Italian though - they have eastern twists in various dishes - which make it different in a great way.  The dishes are simply more flavourful.  I love the various pasta sauces and seasoning that use saffron.  The chicken pastas, steak pastas and seafood pastas are all awesome.  I am not a big steak person and have also heard that their steaks are not their strong point.  The two poutines are really great as well - which again also are different from regular poutines as they have hints of eastern flavours.  Awesome restaurant.  If you feel like having Italian, and want to try something different, this is definitely the place. 5 4 
I did what I could to keep it short for my review of Joel Robuchon, the exalted chef's fine-dining boite at the MGM Grand. I will make no such attempts in conveying my feelings about Chef Robuchon's small-plates restaurant, L'Atelier.Robuchon (the restaurant) could be well personified by Grace Kelly, regal, elegant, breathtaking perfection... L'Atelier de Joel Robuchon might then be personified by Catherine Deneuve... coquettish, modern, a little more casual but no less enthralling. If Grace Kelly belongs on a pedestal to be quite rightly worshipped, then Ms. Deneuve seems a better fit between the sheets on an extended stay at the Hotel Georges V.It would be far simpler a task for me to juggle two Buicks than it would to choose between Kelly and Deneuve. A similar quandary, it follows, to what I face when attempting to choose between Joel Robuchon and L'Atelier. Sometimes, though, these choices must be made and to be quite frank, courting a real Princess for more than a day might grow tiresome in the balance. Reluctantly then, I admit that if forced to, I cast my long-term lot with the fair Ms. Deneuve. In the same light, I would have to confess a slight preference for L'Atelier, a spot at which I would quickly agree to eat every single night. Here's a few reasons why...Le Cocotte- Parsley puree at the bottom of a martini glass, topped with mushroom cream, and a raw egg (stay with me) and then more mushroom cream and a couple of sauteed mushrooms on top. Then they put the whole thing in a steamer until the egg whites *just* set. Creamy, yolky, mushroom-ey.. the richness of it all cut perfectly by the bracing green-ness of the parsley puree.Le Langoustine- the sweetest langoustine you've ever tasted, wrapped with a basil leaf in a thin sheet of brik dough and quickly deep fried. Plated with a micro greens salad and basil pesto. Seriously, I could eat 50 of these.Le Thon Rouge- Thin slices of tuna arranged on a plate with tomato-infused oil and sea salt. You can really taste the tomato in the oil and I don't know how they do that. Perfectly salted and the texture of the tuna is as magical as a first kiss. Le Saumon- A healthy portion of house-smoked salmon, plated with a potato waffle (with really deep wells, more surface area, more CRUNCH) and dill cream. The creamy crunchy potato, the smoky salty salmon, and the cool and herbaceous cream all conspire to create what might just be a perfect plate. 10 out of 10.Le Caille- Quail stuffed with foie gras and coated in a citrus glaze. I am careful, as a gentleman, to confine my profanity to special cases. That said... holy fucking shit this is good. Served with a small pot of truffled potato puree prepared to the following ratio - 1 part potato to 1 part butter. It is not uncommon for a fight to break out over the last spoonful.Le Foie Gras- Raviolis of foie gras in a chicken broth with Thai basil and herb cream. The ravioli are quite salty at first, but then it becomes apparent that they are a perfect foil for the rich chicken broth in which they float. The basil and cream add top notes and bottom notes and once again you are transported by a mere food item to some magical place where the London Philharmonic plays neighborhood concerts and hundred dollar bills rain from the sky.Ris de Veau- Here's where we get to what might be the defining characteristic of a restaurant of this caliber. I wouldn't dare order sweetbreads at just about any other establishment. No thanks. But at L'Atelier? Mais bien sur! Seared on the outside, creamy on the inside, stuck through with a sprig of holly and plated with a lettuce leaf stuffed with onions and butter. One of the best things I've ever eaten and I almost let my prejudice prevent me from ordering it. Shameful.Le Chartreuse- A souffle made with green chartreuse liqueur and topped with pistachio ice cream. Words cannot express how good this is. Eggy, Sweet, and a little flowery. Suffice it to say that it tastes like heaven in a ramekin.Chocolate Sensation- Let's see if I can remember this right... melting Aragani chocolate on the bottom, then a disc of chocolate on top of that, then white chocolate ice cream on top of that, and then oreo cookie crumbs on top of the whole thing. Rob a bank if you have to. Kidnap a rich kid. Sue McDonalds for scorching your naughty bits. It will all be worth the effort to secure a bowl of this.Look, I know I go a little overboard sometimes. I am well aware of my bias. But if you are looking to sample cuisine that is executed at the highest possible level... trust me, if you've got a steady job you can well afford the tariff of a visit here. My precious L'Atelier... that haunts me in my sleep and in my troubled mind weaves daydream tapestries of earthly abandon. Soon, my dear. Soon I will return to your loving arms and we will write epics to make Chaucer blush, and Shakespeare jealous. I am already counting the days. 5 4 
I took our 2011 S550 here for a regular service and to have the backup alarm checked out. The backup alarm was not as loud as it had been before. It essentially was not audible and non functional...UNSAFE!  I had it to MB of Scottsdale twice and was told: "That's how it is.  It can't be adjusted."  The guys at Auto Haus actually checked it out on their computer, and found it was set at only 40%. They turned it up, and what do you know, I can hear it like  it used to be. Huh! So if you actually do the work, you can fix things. I guess some shops don't think this small repair is worth their time. Auto Haus is a professional shop. Chris and Travis made my car right and care about what they do . They have earned my business. 5 stars. Score: Auto Haus 1; Dealer 0 5 1 
Just Baked Cupcakes & Coffee House has the most creative variety of cupcakes I've ever seen. The cupcakes are delicious, and have an artistic and creative presentation. The first thing I noticed when I came into the shop, however, was the hospitality of the owners and how happy the customers were who were sitting at the tables. It's actually a two-story house that they've refurbished, and there's nice art on the walls, along with antique furniture everywhere. The rooms have comfortable seating and the atmosphere is very relaxed. The owner is great at making creative designs in the coffee, and the cupcakes are the best I've ever tasted. (I think they're good enough to go on the show "Cupcake Wars.") This has turned into one of my favorite places to go to for a real treat. In fact, I work at the nearby college, and my co-workers and I sometimes come here to conduct business meetings, we love it so much.  Their wireless is free, and we've had no problem with our computers and iPads working during our meetings. To sum up:  great food, great drinks, great service.  Love it! 5 4 
Have you ever walked into a restaurant and thought to yourself, "Well, this is going to be different"? It's an exciting feeling that doesn't happen all that often; but, walking into Guu Izakaya on Church St., I was definitely overcome by that thought.  Everyone who enters and exits gets a loud greeting and goodbye from the entire staff. A bit overwhelming, but it certainly sets the tone for your evening. The place is an absolute nuthouse in the best possible way.That evening, my two companions and I were lucky enough to get seats within a few minutes upon arriving, a rare feat as I understand it. Guu features communal dining, with long tables that seat around 15 - 20 people, as well as seats at the bar where you can watch the chefs work. There is a two-hour time limit for diners and often a 1-2 hour wait for a seat. If you can, go early or prepare to cool your heels for a while. I promise you that it will be worth it.My friends had been to Guu before so they did the bulk of the ordering. They chose the best dishes they'd had before and also took cues from our tablemates who'd ordered some fascinating fare. The menu is set up tapas-style, a fantastic way to sample all sorts of delicious creations. We ordered eight dishes for the three of us which was just about right and all were quite reasonably priced.The first to arrive was the decidedly (and awesomely) decadent deep-fried brie served with a mango and blueberry sauce.  The four pyramid-shaped morsels were golden and crispy on the outside and gooey, rich deliciousness on the inside. Like, eyes-rolling-in-the-back-of-your-head-good. Next up: the salmon sashimi. Melt in your mouth greatness. It's one of those simple dishes that really sings based on the merits of great, high quality ingredients.On to the bacon-wrapped scallops and enoki mushrooms. Holy. Smokes. Bacon-wrapped anything is a winner in my books but here the contrasting textures played against each other so beautifully. Paired with the salty pork, the sweet scallop and earthy mushrooms, this dish was so good that it was tempting to cancel the rest of our order and have nothing but this for the rest of the night.The beef carpaccio was placed before our wide eyes next and it was a lovely, bright contrast to the richness of the dish before. Served with with ponzu, wasabi, mayo & garlic chips, this rare beef was light and, somehow, refreshing. It was nice to have a lighter bite after the richness of the scallops before.It was at this point in our meal that I noticed a crowd of waiters pause from their constant, frenetic activity. Then I spotted a server with a slice of cake with a candle in it. Guu's birthday celebrations put Chuck E. Cheese to shame. Not only did the wait staff lead the entire restaurant in a rousing rendition of "Happy Birthday", encouraging everyone to clap and sing along, but even the insanely busy chefs joined in. At one point, they had the lights flickering on and off. Utter celebrational pandemonium and it was amazing.Once the place had settled down a little (to be clear, Guu is the least settled place on the planet), the strangest creation of the evening appeared at our table. It was roughly the size of a softball, deep fried and had a wooden knife protruding from the centre. We wracked our brains trying to figure out if we had actually ordered it, decided we hadn't and dug in anyway. What it turned out to be was a Japanese scotch egg with a layer of pureed pumpkin surrounding a hard-boiled egg. While I was skeptical initially - I'm not a big pumpkin fan, much to the horror of many of my friends - the combination of the creamy pumpkin, rich egg, crispy exterior and tangy sauce was downright addictive. We just about scraped the plate without chopsticks long after other dishes had been cleared away.When the spare ribs arrived, it was all I could do to refrain from gobbling them all up myself. The marinated beef was tender and salty, having surely been marinated for quite some time. If you're a fan of spare ribs, these are a can't-miss.The final dishes of the night were the decadent, baked oysters and the light, miso-glazed black cod. We ordered the oysters because we saw them arrive for another group at our table and they looked so unique! Kind of a twist on oysters Rockefeller, they're served with spinach and mushrooms, smothered in a potent mayo-garlic sauce and topped with melted cheese...all in a giant shell. This was a thing of glorious, messy beauty. The mushrooms nestled in there made for an umami bomb of a bite. Definitely give this one a shot, my friends. It's weird and tasty and I've never seen it anywhere else.Not only was this one of the best meals I've had all year, it was by far and away the most fun. Unquestionably, the company helped but the atmosphere at Guu is like none other. It's not the place to go for a quiet, intimate dinner; it's the place to go when you want to try innovative, playful and truly remarkable dishes. 5 4 
So, whenever you have a California gurl in a Mexican Restaurant, it has to be good.  My weary tummy has not had anything substantial all day, and having read the best of the best about the amazing La Tolteca, I decided to let me feet hit the street & check out this local flor in the rough.  Well, I have to say the reviews are all TRUTH.  The green enchilada's were my choice as I've not ever been huge fan of the red sauce, in addition to a full range of all that one could feast your immediate appetite too, there is also fresh tortillas, candy, the bakery which is a temptation I did avoid (thank you P90X) and yes, I did say it, the temptation is the BAKERY,  the smells hit your nose before you even step in, yeast, sugar and spices, La Raza!  Enjoy your time, don't rush, I wandered around and grabbed my favorite Fanta to connect the true flavors of home, Cali and my youth, thanks for the great time La Tolteca, and you'd better be sure that I'll be stopping in again with re-inforcements.   Gracias & Happy Eating 5 3 
I want to write the review for the entire city of Montreal but unfortunately I can't do that. Instead I'll just have to write about each location I went to. Let's just say this is one of my favorites! The sphere is beautiful and I really loved learning about the environment and biodiversity.  The little park across from it is peaceful and beautiful too. Montreal is the best city i've ever been to!!!! 5 4 
Took a large group here last night and everyone enjoyed the pizzas.  Or was it the super friendly waitress shelly. Just about the friendliest I've ver seen. Dessert were amazing as well starting with the tiramisu. 5 4 
I came here to paddleboard with Outdoor Afro group. We learned how to paddle board and enjoy the beautiful weather. They had an opening tonight with free food and drinks. 5 4 
The latte is one of the best I've had in the city.  The tables out front offer a great view of 17th Ave. 5 4 
Waffles, sandwiches, and beer! Who ever thought of that!? Really random, but it works! The interior is more appealing than the exterior. I came in for a light dessert, and what I ordered was perfect. I love how light and fluffy these waffles were. I will have to go back to try the chicken and waffle sandwich. 5 4 
Found this great spot on yelp. Traveling and needed a quick pedi. Probably one of the best pedicures I have had. Skilled technician and nice people. Worth every dime. 5 4 
I was told about a possible brake issue around 200.00. I said go ahead and fix it. When I arrived, he found that the actual problem was something minor and only charged me 40.00!!! No mechanic has ever been this honest with me before. Oh yeah, be sure you talk to Gary. 5 1 
We tried this place for the first time today after reading the reviews on Yelp and it did not disappoint. They were slammed when we walked in, but they were so friendly and attentive that the wait didn't seem as long. There were so many tantalizing options on the menu, but we decided on the Huevos Rancheros, Chilaquiles and the Bacon Burger. I am a Chilaquiles connoisseur and for not being a Mexican restaurant, these were delicious! My family thoroughly enjoyed their dishes as well. The attentiveness and service was great even though it did take a little more time than normal to get our food. It was definitely worth the wait. We will be back soon and we are happy to have found our new go-to brunch spot!Highly recommend!! 5 4 
Friendly, fast, $2 discount immediately honored, but gave him $20 anyway. Will give them my business again next time. Thanks, keep it up! 5 4 
So one thing that really stands out to me: one of the employees (John I believe) emailed me a copy of my inspection before coming out to talk to me. And the email included pictures! I've never seen this before. Maybe I'm behind, but before coming here I always went to Honda of Concord and Scott Clark Honda (wouldn't recommend either) and I've never seen this. I'm always cautious due to receiving false info regarding needed car repairs. This definitely gave me a peace of mind. This is my third or fourth time coming here and I'll definitely be back. The only downside for me is the business hours of 8-5 but aside from that I love this place. 5 3 
